LINGVAMYXA STRUCTURE / TRANSLATOR REFACTORING, VERSION 2
РЕФАКТОРИНГ STRUCTURE / ТРАНСЛЯТОРА LINGVAMYXA, ВЕРСИЯ 2

Normative architecture agreement
Нормативное архитектурное соглашение

Date / Дата: 2026-09-06


0. Status and purpose
Статус и назначение
====================

EN

This document records the agreed target architecture for the next
Lingvamyxa translator core and runtime Structure representation. It is a
rewrite contract, not a description of the current implementation.

The parser remains. The translator core after the parser is rewritten.
Compatibility with an accidental C-shaped representation in the current
translator is not a goal. Source semantics are primary; emitted C is a
secondary implementation.

The words MUST, MUST NOT, REQUIRED, SHALL, SHALL NOT, SHOULD, SHOULD NOT and
MAY have their usual normative meanings. A section explicitly labelled
UNRESOLVED records a decision that has not yet been made. An unresolved
implementation detail must not be silently answered by restoring runtime
descriptors, per-Structure C types, a runtime namespace, or any other
mechanism prohibited by this document.

RU

Этот документ фиксирует согласованную целевую архитектуру нового ядра
транслятора Lingvamyxa и runtime-представления Structure. Это контракт на
переписывание, а не описание текущей реализации.

Parser сохраняется. Ядро транслятора после parser-а переписывается.
Совместимость со случайно получившимся C-подобным представлением текущего
транслятора не является целью. Семантика исходного языка первична; выдаваемый
C является вторичной реализацией.

Слова MUST, MUST NOT, REQUIRED, SHALL, SHALL NOT, SHOULD, SHOULD NOT и MAY
используются в обычном нормативном смысле. Раздел с явной пометкой
UNRESOLVED фиксирует ещё не принятое решение. Неразрешённую техническую
деталь нельзя молча решать возвратом runtime-дескрипторов, отдельных C-типов
для Structure, runtime namespace или другого механизма, запрещённого этим
документом.


0.1. One-sentence contract
Задание одной фразой
--------------------

EN

Keep the existing parser, replace the translator core, represent every
runtime source node by the same three-word Lmx header, keep names outside
the nodes in the sole Lmx-pointer-to-ShortNameId auxiliary table, compile
every method to one program-wide reachable uniquely identified C entry
accepting exactly the containing Structure Lmx pointer, construct all source
Structures and source locals as runtime Lmx
nodes, resolve arbitrary textual absolute paths from an explicit root, and execute merge dynamically
by copying trees when program execution reaches the merge; every Message owns
one logical arena, and every running L3 Thread consumes its FIFO message stream
one turn at a time while different Messages may execute concurrently.

RU

Сохранить существующий parser, заменить ядро транслятора, представлять каждый
runtime-узел исходника одним и тем же трёхсловным заголовком Lmx, держать
имена вне узлов в единственной вспомогательной таблице
Lmx-указатель-в-ShortNameId, компилировать каждый метод в один достижимый во
всей программе уникально идентифицированный C-entry ровно с одним аргументом —
Lmx-указателем на содержащую Structure, строить все
исходные Structure и исходные локальные значения как runtime-узлы Lmx,
разрешать произвольные текстовые абсолютные пути от явно переданного корня и
выполнять merge динамически,
копированием деревьев в тот момент, когда исполнение программы дошло до
merge; каждый Message владеет одной логической arena, а каждый исполняемый L3
Thread потребляет свой FIFO-поток сообщений последовательно, по одному turn,
тогда как разные Messages могут исполняться параллельно.


0.2. Mandated core versus open details
Обязательное ядро и открытые детали
-----------------------------------

EN

The following are already decided and are not design options:

1. The parser stays.
2. The translator core is rewritten rather than incrementally adapting the
   existing typed-C projection.
3. Lmx has exactly the common header specified in section 3.
4. A node contains no name, descriptor, type tag, vtable or per-Structure
   layout pointer.
5. No named Structure causes a C typedef or a dedicated C struct layout.
6. Source locals are Structure nodes, not semantic C locals.
7. A generated C method has exactly one explicit parameter: the Lmx pointer
   to the Structure containing the selected callable occurrence.
8. Every generated method has program-wide reachable identity and a unique
   deterministic name; a long name mangled from its complete source path is
   the preferred spelling.
9. Method entry addresses belong to one common recognizable physical class,
   implemented by one or more registered ranges/sections or an equivalent
   callable-record domain.
10. Merge is a runtime tree-copying operation. Translation never flattens a
    merge into a target C struct.
11. The sole auxiliary node metadata table maps Lmx pointers to ShortNameId.
12. Arbitrary textual absolute runtime path resolution starts at an explicitly
    supplied runtime root and uses
    that table.
13. There is no runtime namespace and therefore no runtime namespace
    push, overlay, merge, capture or pop.
14. Every Message owns exactly one logical arena. Launching that Message as an
    L3 Thread preserves the same arena; the arena belongs to the Message, not
    to whichever host worker happens to execute a turn.
15. All mutable/dynamic source-semantic Lmx nodes and payload storage created
    for a Message, including Structures, source locals, non-interned primitives
    and ordinary Arrays, belong to that Message arena. Immutable program-wide
    pools such as `all_chars` and compiled method records/code may be shared.
16. Every L3 Thread executes at most one of its turns at a time. Its admitted
    messages and staged outgoing messages are ordered FIFO. Distinct L3 Threads
    may execute concurrently and may migrate among host workers.
17. Mutable Lmx storage is not shared by raw pointer between concurrently
    executing Message arenas. Cross-Message interaction uses explicit Message
    delivery/adoption/serialization rules.
18. Common L3 and Mix concurrency is Message concurrency. Raw threads, shared
    memory, atomics, mutexes and custom synchronization may exist only in an
    explicit L2 profile and do not supply a portable common-LMX algorithm.
19. A Message turn publishes its successful staged FIFO outbox, or rolls it
    back on failure, before local collection of that Message arena. Collection
    runs at the common end-turn boundary; terminating the Message ultimately
    releases its arena after required transfer/cleanup.

Only the details explicitly identified as unresolved in section 14 remain
open. They may choose among implementations only inside these fixed boundaries.

RU

Следующее уже решено и не является набором вариантов:

1. Parser сохраняется.
2. Ядро транслятора переписывается, а не приспосабливает постепенно
   существующую типизированную C-проекцию.
3. Lmx имеет ровно общий заголовок из раздела 3.
4. В узле нет имени, дескриптора, тега типа, vtable или указателя на layout
   конкретной Structure.
5. Именованная Structure не порождает typedef или отдельный layout struct в
   C.
6. Локальные значения исходного языка являются узлами Structure, а не
   семантическими C-local.
7. Сгенерированный C-метод имеет ровно один явный параметр: Lmx pointer на
   Structure, содержащую выбранный callable-occurrence.
8. Каждый сгенерированный метод имеет достижимую во всей программе identity и
   уникальное детерминированное имя; предпочтительный spelling — длинное имя,
   полученное из полного пути исходника.
9. Адреса входов методов принадлежат одной общей распознаваемой физической
   категории, реализованной одним или несколькими зарегистрированными
   диапазонами/секциями либо эквивалентным доменом callable-record.
10. Merge является runtime-операцией копирования дерева. Трансляция никогда
    не превращает merge заранее в целевой C struct.
11. Единственная вспомогательная таблица метаданных узлов отображает
    Lmx-указатель в ShortNameId.
12. Разрешение произвольного текстового абсолютного runtime-пути начинается
    от явно переданного runtime-корня и использует эту таблицу.
13. Runtime namespace отсутствует; следовательно, отсутствуют его runtime
    push, overlay, merge, capture и pop.
14. Каждый Message владеет ровно одной логической arena. При запуске Message
    как L3 Thread сохраняется та же arena; она принадлежит Message, а не host
    worker, на котором случайно исполняется конкретный turn.
15. Все изменяемые/dynamic Lmx-узлы и payload исходной семантики, создаваемые
    для Message, включая Structures, locals исходника, не-interned примитивы и
    обычные Arrays, принадлежат arena этого Message. Неизменяемые глобальные
    пулы наподобие `all_chars`, а также записи/код скомпилированных методов
    могут использоваться совместно.
16. Каждый L3 Thread исполняет не более одного своего turn одновременно. Его
    принятые сообщения и подготовленные исходящие сообщения упорядочены FIFO.
    Разные L3 Threads могут исполняться параллельно и мигрировать между host
    workers.
17. Изменяемое Lmx-хранилище не разделяется сырым указателем между arena
    одновременно исполняемых Messages. Cross-Message взаимодействие использует
    явные правила доставки/adoption/serialization сообщений.
18. Конкурентность общего L3 и Mix является Message-конкурентностью. Raw
    threads, shared memory, atomics, mutexes и custom synchronization допустимы
    только в явном L2-профиле и не образуют переносимого общего алгоритма LMX.
19. Turn Message публикует успешно подготовленный FIFO outbox либо откатывает
    его при failure до локальной collection arena этого Message. Collection
    выполняется на общей границе end-turn; termination Message в итоге
    освобождает его arena после требуемого transfer/cleanup.

Открыты только детали, явно названные неразрешёнными в разделе 14. Их можно
выбирать лишь внутри этих уже зафиксированных границ.


1. Ontology and terminology
Онтология и термины
==========================

1.1. Structure, tree and graph
Structure, дерево и граф
------------------------------

EN

A Structure is not an object, class instance, target-language aggregate or
method table. It is a source-semantic structure represented at runtime by Lmx
nodes.

The source containment relation is a tree. Every non-root Lmx node has one
source parent, recorded by node. Following node repeatedly therefore reaches
one root and must never form a cycle.

References stored as data may point to nodes outside the containment
subtree. Together with those reference edges, the complete runtime memory may
be a graph and may expose many paths to the same node. Those extra graph edges
do not change the node parent relation.

The word object MUST NOT be used to justify object identity rules, method
dispatch tables, inheritance, hidden receiver objects or per-instance
namespaces. The implementation deals with Structures and references.

RU

Structure не является объектом, экземпляром класса, агрегатом целевого языка
или таблицей методов. Это структура семантики исходного языка, представленная
в runtime узлами Lmx.

Отношение вложенности исходника является деревом. У каждого Lmx-узла, кроме
корня, есть ровно один исходный родитель, записанный в node. Поэтому
последовательный переход по node обязан приводить к одному корню и никогда не
может образовывать цикл.

Ссылки, лежащие в data, могут указывать на узлы вне поддерева вложенности.
Вместе с такими рёбрами ссылок вся runtime-память может быть графом и давать
много путей к одному узлу. Эти дополнительные рёбра графа не меняют
родительское отношение node.

Слово object нельзя использовать для обоснования объектной identity,
таблиц dispatch, наследования, скрытых receiver-объектов или namespace у
каждого instance. Реализация работает со Structure и ссылками.


1.2. Root
Корень
-----------

EN

A live execution graph has a root Lmx node. Starting from any node in its
containment tree, root is obtained by following node until the parent is
absent. Arbitrary textual absolute runtime path lookup begins at an explicitly
supplied root, never at a mutable runtime namespace. Direct resolved pointers
and relative paths keep their own starting node.

The exact representation of the absent parent is an ABI detail to be fixed;
the normal candidate is a null node pointer. Whatever representation is
selected must be unique and must make root discovery deterministic.

RU

У живого графа исполнения есть корневой узел Lmx. Из любого узла его дерева
вложенности корень получается последовательным переходом по node до
отсутствующего родителя. Поиск произвольного текстового абсолютного
runtime-пути начинается с явно переданного корня, а не с изменяемого runtime
namespace. Уже разрешённые указатели и относительные пути сохраняют собственный
начальный узел.

Точное представление отсутствующего родителя является деталью ABI, которую
ещё нужно закрепить; обычный кандидат — null в node. Выбранное представление
обязано быть единственным и делать нахождение корня детерминированным.


1.3. Physical class versus source meaning
Физический класс и смысл исходника
---------------------------------------

EN

The address range containing data tells the runtime how that payload is
physically handled. This is not static analysis of a named Structure and does
not create a closed language-level class hierarchy.

For example, an address inside all_chars identifies character storage. An
address inside a registered callable range identifies executable method
storage or a callable record. An address inside an Lmx-node allocation range identifies Lmx
storage. Empty data has its selected empty representation.

The runtime may use different ranges for other primitive stores, arrays or
opaque cells. Range boundaries are substrate facts. They are not descriptors
attached to each node.

RU

Диапазон адресов, в который попадает data, говорит runtime, как физически
обращаться с этим payload. Это не статический анализ именованной Structure и
не создание закрытой иерархии классов языка.

Например, адрес внутри all_chars обозначает хранилище символов. Адрес внутри
общей секции методов обозначает исполняемый метод. Адрес внутри диапазона
выделения Lmx-узлов обозначает хранилище Lmx. Для пустого data используется
выбранное представление пустоты.

Runtime может иметь иные диапазоны для других примитивных хранилищ, массивов
или opaque-ячеек. Границы диапазонов являются фактами субстрата, а не
дескрипторами, прикреплёнными к каждому узлу.


1.4. Short name
Короткое имя
----------------

EN

ShortNameId is the compact identity of one path component, not a descriptor,
type, namespace binding or full path. The Lmx node does not contain this ID.
The sole auxiliary node metadata table associates the address of an Lmx node
with its ShortNameId.

A full path is a sequence of short-name components plus any explicitly
defined occurrence selectors. A full path is not cached as mandatory metadata
on every node.

RU

ShortNameId — компактная идентичность одного компонента пути, а не
дескриптор, тип, binding namespace или полный путь. Узел Lmx не содержит этот
ID. Единственная вспомогательная таблица метаданных узла связывает адрес
Lmx-узла с его ShortNameId.

Полный путь является последовательностью компонентов коротких имён плюс явно
определённые селекторы occurrence. Полный путь не кэшируется как обязательные
метаданные каждого узла.


1.5. Mix and Message ontology
Онтология Mix и Message
-------------------------

EN

Mix belongs to the same Message/Lmx graph ontology described by this document.
Its placement edges, value edges, cursors, marks, locks, mirrors and messages may
play different operational roles while remaining parts of one Message object
universe. The target Mix architecture is a Message-based graph.

The current Java Mix implementation is a transitional procedural,
multithreaded implementation in a different concurrency paradigm. It is
implementation evidence only and requires a complete Message-style refactoring.
Its current worker, cursor and notification mechanics do not change the target
ontology and are not an excuse to add a runtime namespace, attached descriptor
or per-Structure C layout.

The one-arena-per-Message ownership rule, FIFO order and single-turn-at-a-time
execution of one L3 Thread are part of the common L3 semantics, not optional
backend profiles. What remains selectable is the number and kind of host
workers, physical arena block strategy, collection algorithm and concrete
transport. Mix therefore cannot standardize the Java implementation's locks
and independently multithreaded cursor algorithms as common LMX semantics;
those operations must be refactored into Messages and transport-independent
Message protocols. HTTP and physical mail are merely different transports for
the same semantic boundary.

RU

Mix принадлежит той же Message/Lmx-онтологии графа, которая описана этим
документом. Рёбра размещения и значения, курсоры, метки, локи, зеркала и
сообщения могут играть разные операционные роли внутри одной Message-вселенной
объектов. Целевая архитектура Mix является Message-based графом.

Текущая Java-реализация Mix — переходная процедурная многопоточная реализация в
другой парадигме конкурентности. Она служит только свидетельством текущего
кода и требует полного рефакторинга в Message-style. Её нынешние workers,
курсоры и notifications не меняют целевую онтологию и не разрешают добавлять
runtime namespace, attached descriptor или per-Structure C layout.

Правило одной arena на Message, FIFO-порядок и исполнение не более одного turn
одного L3 Thread одновременно входят в общую семантику L3, а не являются
необязательным backend-профилем. Выбираемыми остаются количество и вид host
workers, физическая стратегия блоков arena, алгоритм collection и конкретный
транспорт. Поэтому Mix не может перенести локи и независимо многопоточные
алгоритмы курсоров Java-реализации в общую семантику LMX: операции должны быть
перестроены в Messages и transport-independent Message-протоколы. HTTP и
физическая почта являются лишь разными транспортами одной семантической
границы.


2. Preserved parser and replaced translator core
Сохраняемый parser и заменяемое ядро транслятора
================================================

2.1. Parser boundary
Граница parser-а
---------------------

EN

The current parser remains the source-front-end boundary. Its job is to
recognize source syntax and produce the source tree with source positions,
ordering, nesting and spelling required by later stages.

The parser is not responsible for:

* creating runtime descriptors;
* selecting C struct layouts;
* expanding merge;
* deciding C field offsets;
* creating a runtime namespace;
* flattening nested methods into descriptor fields;
* deciding which source Structures are C types.

Small parser corrections are outside this architecture rewrite unless an
independent parser defect is demonstrated. The rewrite begins after the
parser's tree.

RU

Текущий parser остаётся границей входного front-end. Его задача — распознать
синтаксис исходника и выдать дерево исходника с позициями, порядком,
вложенностью и spelling, необходимыми следующим стадиям.

Parser не отвечает за:

* создание runtime-дескрипторов;
* выбор layout C struct;
* раскрытие merge;
* вычисление смещений C-полей;
* создание runtime namespace;
* превращение вложенных методов в поля дескриптора;
* решение, какие Structure исходника являются C-типами.

Мелкие исправления parser-а не входят в эту архитектурную переделку, пока не
показан независимый дефект parser-а. Переписывание начинается после дерева,
выданного parser-ом.


2.2. Rewrite boundary
Граница переписывания
--------------------------

EN

The old translator core MUST NOT be treated as the architecture and patched
until its generated C superficially resembles Lingvamyxa. Its assumptions
about per-name C types, descriptors, typed members, top-level-only callable
emission, lexical capture structs or compile-time merge are not the base of
version 2.

The new core consumes the parser tree and emits:

1. runtime construction operations for Lmx trees;
2. runtime lookup operations based on root and ShortNameId;
3. runtime merge calls at the original execution sites;
4. one global C implementation symbol for every executable source method,
   including methods nested in named Structures;
5. registration/construction operations that associate every live named node
   with its ShortNameId;
6. calls using the one-Lmx-pointer method ABI.

Existing code may be consulted as an inventory of syntax and tests. Reusing a
helper is allowed only when its semantics and representation already satisfy
this document. Existing generated-C snapshots are not proof of semantic
conformance.

RU

Старое ядро транслятора нельзя считать архитектурой и латать до тех пор, пока
его C-вывод внешне не станет похож на Lingvamyxa. Его предположения об
отдельных C-типах на каждое имя, дескрипторах, типизированных members,
эмиссии callable только верхнего уровня, C-структурах lexical capture или
compile-time merge не являются основой версии 2.

Новое ядро принимает дерево parser-а и выдаёт:

1. runtime-операции построения деревьев Lmx;
2. runtime-поиск на основе корня и ShortNameId;
3. runtime-вызовы merge в исходных местах исполнения;
4. один глобальный C-символ реализации для каждого исполняемого метода
   исходника, включая методы внутри именованных Structure;
5. операции регистрации/построения, связывающие каждый живой именованный
   узел с его ShortNameId;
6. вызовы по ABI с одним Lmx-указателем.

Существующий код можно использовать как перечень синтаксических конструкций и
тестов. Повторно использовать helper можно только тогда, когда его семантика
и представление уже соответствуют этому документу. Снимки сгенерированного C
не доказывают семантического соответствия.


2.3. Translation-unit locality
Локальность единицы трансляции
-----------------------------------

EN

Translating HashArray.lm2 translates declarations and executable bodies
declared by that source unit. It MUST NOT scan a directory and pre-compose
the complete Array tree into a static HashArray layout.

References to Structures supplied by another unit must lower to an already
resolved Lmx pointer, an explicit root-relative lookup, or a runtime provider
that returns an Lmx pointer. References to code lower to entries in the common
callable physical class. The term "runtime binding" must not mean a hidden
Name-to-value map. The build/link layer may compile the supplying unit
separately. Runtime module loading is a possible profile mechanism, but it is
not implicit compile-time merge.

The translator must recursively discover executable definitions inside the
current parser tree. Current-unit locality does not mean top-level-only
traversal.

RU

Трансляция HashArray.lm2 переводит объявления и исполняемые тела, объявленные
этой единицей исходника. Она не должна сканировать директорию и заранее
собирать полное дерево Array в статический layout HashArray.

Ссылки на Structure из другой единицы обязаны снижаться в уже разрешённый
Lmx-указатель, явный lookup относительно root либо runtime provider,
возвращающий Lmx-указатель. Ссылки на код снижаются во входы общей физической
категории callable. Термин "runtime binding" не может означать скрытую map
Name-to-value. Build/link слой может отдельно скомпилировать предоставляющую
их единицу. Runtime-загрузка модулей возможна как механизм профиля, но она не
является неявным compile-time merge.

Транслятор обязан рекурсивно находить исполняемые определения внутри текущего
дерева parser-а. Локальность текущей единицы не означает обход только
верхнего уровня.


3. The sole Lmx node header
Единственный заголовок узла Lmx
===================================

3.1. Required C shape
Обязательная форма C
-------------------------

The common representation is exactly:

    typedef struct Lmx Lmx;

    struct Lmx {
        Lmx *node;
        size_t len;
        void *data;
    };

EN

The field order is normative. node is first, len is second, and data is
third. Every runtime source node starts with this representation.

The common header MUST NOT be extended with any of the following:

* descriptor pointer;
* type pointer or type tag;
* field name or ShortNameId;
* source path;
* vtable or method table;
* class or layout table;
* field-offset table;
* runtime namespace pointer;
* lexical environment pointer;
* reference count;
* capacity word;
* per-node allocator kind.

If an implementation needs allocation bookkeeping, section boundaries,
debugging information or ownership metadata, that information is external to
the semantic Lmx node and cannot become a fourth mandatory header word. This
does not make ownership non-semantic: the rule that every Message owns exactly
one arena is normative. Only the arena/range bookkeeping is kept outside each
three-word node.

RU

Порядок полей нормативен. Сначала находится node, затем len, затем data.
Каждый runtime-узел исходника начинается с этого представления.

Общий заголовок нельзя расширять ни одним из следующих полей:

* указатель на дескриптор;
* указатель типа или тег типа;
* имя поля или ShortNameId;
* путь исходника;
* vtable или таблица методов;
* таблица class или layout;
* таблица смещений полей;
* указатель на runtime namespace;
* указатель lexical environment;
* счётчик ссылок;
* слово capacity;
* per-node вид allocator-а.

Если реализации нужны метаданные allocation, границы секций, отладочная
информация или ownership, эти данные находятся вне семантического узла Lmx и
не могут стать обязательным четвёртым словом заголовка. Это не делает
ownership несемантическим: правило ровно одной arena у каждого Message
нормативно. За пределами трёхсловного узла находится лишь bookkeeping
arena/диапазонов.


3.2. Meaning of node
Смысл node
----------------

EN

node is the parent in the source containment tree as materialized by this
particular runtime tree.

For every contained child c of parent p:

    c->node == p

For a copied tree, node points into the copy. A merge MUST NOT leave a copied
child's node pointing to the corresponding parent in the source tree.

A reference edge to an already existing Lmx node does not change that
referent's node. One node has one containment parent even when several graph
paths reach it.

node is not a descriptor pointer, next-sibling pointer, namespace frame,
owner object, class link or C inheritance link.

RU

node является родителем в дереве вложенности исходника, материализованном
именно этим runtime-деревом.

Для каждого вложенного ребёнка c родителя p:

    c->node == p

В скопированном дереве node указывает внутрь копии. Merge не имеет права
оставлять node скопированного ребёнка указывающим на соответствующего
родителя исходного дерева.

Ребро-ссылка на уже существующий Lmx-узел не меняет node этого референта. У
одного узла один родитель вложенности, даже когда к нему ведёт несколько
путей графа.

node не является указателем на дескриптор, next-sibling, frame namespace,
owner object, class link или ссылкой C-наследования.


3.3. Meaning of len and data
Смысл len и data
------------------------------

EN

data is the only payload pointer. It may address structural Lmx storage,
primitive storage, a callable payload in the common callable physical class, array
storage, opaque substrate storage, or the selected empty representation.

Even a primitive byte is not embedded into the data word. The data word
contains a pointer to that byte. For the canonical example:

    Lmx:
    . char: '!'
    . #<...>

the payload of the char leaf points to the address of the corresponding
element in the global C array all_chars.

For a non-leaf structural payload, len supplies the bounded extent needed to
walk its contained data. For a leaf, len supplies the extent under the rule of
that payload range. The exact unit of len for every range is UNRESOLVED in
section 14; it MUST NOT be guessed from a per-Structure C type.

data is intentionally void pointer rather than Lmx pointer because the final
leaves are primitive storage or emptiness. A consumer MUST classify the
address range before treating data as Lmx storage.

RU

data является единственным указателем payload. Он может адресовать
структурное хранилище Lmx, хранилище примитива, callable-вход в общем
диапазоне методов, хранилище массива, opaque-субстрат или выбранное
представление пустоты.

Даже примитивный байт не встраивается в слово data. Слово data содержит
указатель на этот байт. В каноническом примере:

    Lmx:
    . char: '!'
    . #<...>

payload листа char указывает на адрес соответствующего элемента глобального
C-массива all_chars.

Для нелистового структурного payload поле len задаёт ограниченный размер,
необходимый для обхода вложенных данных. Для листа len задаёт размер по
правилу диапазона этого payload. Точная единица len для каждого диапазона
остаётся UNRESOLVED в разделе 14; её нельзя угадывать из C-типа конкретной
Structure.

data намеренно имеет тип void pointer, а не Lmx pointer, потому что конечными
листьями являются примитивные хранилища или пустота. Consumer обязан сначала
классифицировать диапазон адреса и только потом обращаться с data как с
хранилищем Lmx.


3.4. No runtime descriptors
Отсутствие runtime-дескрипторов
-----------------------------------

EN

The fixed Lmx header replaces the need for a descriptor prefix. There is no
separate runtime descriptor object at the front of an instance and no pointer
from an instance to a shared descriptor.

Names, layout, field kinds and callable signatures are not recovered by
loading a descriptor from the node. Structural navigation uses data, len,
address-range classification and the ShortNameId side table.

Source words historically called descriptors may still be ordinary parsed
source Structures if the language exposes them as data. They have no
privileged runtime layout and cannot control the representation of another
node merely by being called a descriptor.

RU

Фиксированный заголовок Lmx заменяет необходимость префикса-дескриптора. В
начале instance нет отдельного runtime-объекта дескриптора, а в instance нет
указателя на общий дескриптор.

Имена, layout, виды полей и сигнатуры callable не извлекаются загрузкой
дескриптора из узла. Структурная навигация использует data, len,
классификацию диапазона адресов и side table ShortNameId.

Слова исходника, исторически называвшиеся descriptors, всё ещё могут быть
обычными распарсенными Structure, если язык предоставляет их как данные. У
них нет привилегированного runtime-layout, и они не могут управлять
представлением другого узла только потому, что названы descriptor.


3.5. No per-Structure target layout
Отсутствие target-layout на каждую Structure
------------------------------------------------

EN

The translator MUST NOT emit:

    typedef struct Array { ... } Array;
    typedef struct HashArray { ... } HashArray;

or semantic equivalents used to navigate source fields by C member access.
It MUST NOT select sizeof(Array), offsetof(HashArray, field), a generated
member name, or a closed field-kind vector as the meaning of a source
Structure.

All named and anonymous Structures use Lmx. A backend optimization may only
be introduced later if it is observationally identical and the generic Lmx
representation remains the semantic contract. Such optimization is outside
the initial rewrite.

RU

Транслятор не должен выдавать:

    typedef struct Array { ... } Array;
    typedef struct HashArray { ... } HashArray;

или семантический эквивалент, используемый для перехода по полям исходника
через C member access. Он не должен считать sizeof(Array),
offsetof(HashArray, field), сгенерированное имя member-а или закрытый вектор
видов полей смыслом Structure исходника.

Все именованные и анонимные Structure используют Lmx. Оптимизацию backend-а
можно добавить позднее только при наблюдаемой эквивалентности и сохранении
общего представления Lmx как семантического контракта. Такая оптимизация не
входит в начальное переписывание.


4. Address ranges
Диапазоны адресов
=====================

4.1. Range-directed physical interpretation
Физическая интерпретация по диапазону
------------------------------------------

EN

The runtime determines the physical class of data by testing the address
against known, disjoint ranges or linker-section bounds. It does not inspect
a descriptor or generated C type.

At minimum, the architecture requires distinguishable storage for:

* structural Lmx payload;
* callable payloads that resolve to method entry addresses;
* each primitive storage family that requires distinct physical handling;
* emptiness.

Additional ranges for arrays, opaque handles or profile-specific substrate
may be provided without changing Lmx.

All dynamic mutable ranges used by ordinary source values are owned by the one
arena of the containing Message. One logical arena may own many backing blocks
and many disjoint ranges: structural child blocks, non-interned primitive
cells, Array payloads and other physical classes remain one ownership/lifetime
domain even though their addresses classify differently. Global immutable
ranges such as `all_chars` and the method pool, and explicit foreign L2
resources, are the stated exceptions.

Range tests MUST be deterministic for the complete lifetime of every live
payload. Overlapping ranges with ambiguous interpretation are forbidden.
Moving a live allocation between ranges without updating its Lmx references
is forbidden.

RU

Runtime определяет физический класс data проверкой адреса по известным
непересекающимся диапазонам или границам linker section. Он не читает
дескриптор и не использует сгенерированный C-тип.

Как минимум архитектура требует различимых хранилищ для:

* структурного payload Lmx;
* callable payloads, разрешаемых в адреса входов методов;
* каждого семейства примитивных хранилищ, которому требуется отличающееся
  физическое обращение;
* пустоты.

Дополнительные диапазоны для массивов, opaque handles или
profile-specific substrate могут быть добавлены без изменения Lmx.

Все dynamic mutable диапазоны обычных source values принадлежат одной arena
содержащего их Message. Одна логическая arena может владеть многими backing
blocks и многими непересекающимися диапазонами: структурные блоки детей,
не-interned ячейки примитивов, Array payloads и другие физические категории
остаются одним доменом ownership/lifetime, хотя их адреса классифицируются
по-разному. Явными исключениями являются глобальные immutable диапазоны
наподобие `all_chars` и method pool, а также explicit foreign L2 resources.

Проверка диапазона обязана быть детерминированной всё время жизни каждого
живого payload. Пересекающиеся диапазоны с неоднозначной интерпретацией
запрещены. Перемещение живого allocation между диапазонами без обновления
его Lmx-ссылок запрещено.


4.2. Range information is not a second node table
Информация о диапазонах не является второй таблицей узлов
------------------------------------------------------------

EN

The rule that the ShortNameId map is the sole auxiliary Lmx-node table does
not forbid fixed linker bounds or allocator-wide range boundaries. Those
bounds classify storage regions; they do not map individual Lmx nodes to
semantic metadata.

There MUST NOT be a hidden parallel per-node table for descriptor, type,
layout, namespace, field offset or method owner. If a proposed implementation
needs such a table, it violates the architecture rather than completing an
unresolved detail.

RU

Правило, по которому map ShortNameId является единственной вспомогательной
таблицей Lmx-узлов, не запрещает фиксированные linker bounds или общие
границы диапазона allocator-а. Эти границы классифицируют области хранения,
а не отображают отдельные Lmx-узлы в семантические метаданные.

Скрытая параллельная per-node таблица descriptor, type, layout, namespace,
field offset или owner метода запрещена. Если предлагаемая реализация требует
такой таблицы, она нарушает архитектуру, а не завершает открытую деталь.


4.3. C portability boundary
Граница переносимости C
----------------------------

EN

Comparing unrelated object pointers with relational C operators is not a
portable range test. A concrete C profile SHOULD compare appropriately
converted integer addresses, use linker-provided membership helpers, or use
allocator/section APIs with defined behavior.

Likewise, ISO C does not universally guarantee interchangeability of object
pointers and function pointers. The requirement is semantic: callable payloads
must belong to one recognizable physical class and resolve to entries invokable
with the common ABI. Direct code addresses in one or more sections and pointers
to correctly typed callable records are allowed profile alternatives. The exact
portable or platform-specific representation is an UNRESOLVED profile decision.

RU

Сравнение несвязанных object pointers реляционными операторами C не является
переносимой проверкой диапазона. Конкретный C-профиль должен сравнивать
корректно преобразованные целые адреса, использовать предоставленные linker
membership helpers либо API allocator/section с определённым поведением.

Кроме того, ISO C не гарантирует на всех платформах взаимозаменяемость
указателей на объект и указателей на функцию. Нормативно требуется следующее:
callable payloads принадлежат одной распознаваемой физической категории и
разрешаются во входы, вызываемые по общему ABI. Прямые адреса кода в одной
или нескольких секциях и указатели на корректно типизированные callable-record
являются допустимыми альтернативами профиля. Точное переносимое или
platform-specific представление остаётся решением профиля с пометкой
UNRESOLVED.


5. Names, paths and the sole side table
Имена, пути и единственная side table
==========================================

5.1. Required table
Обязательная таблица
-------------------------

EN

The runtime maintains exactly one auxiliary mapping associated with Lmx
nodes:

    Lmx address  ->  ShortNameId

This table supplies the short name of a node. It does not supply a descriptor,
type, complete path, C layout, lexical depth, callable signature or namespace
frame.

Whenever a named runtime node is constructed, the implementation registers
its address and ShortNameId. Whenever merge copies a named node, it registers
the new address with the same ShortNameId. Positional or anonymous occurrences
must either receive a reserved positional ShortNameId under the selected ABI or
be explicitly excluded from textual-name lookup; this choice is unresolved in
section 14. The copied node is a new key; the source mapping remains unchanged.

Table lifecycle must agree with node lifetime. A dead address must not later
resolve to a stale name if storage is reused.

RU

Runtime поддерживает ровно одно вспомогательное отображение, связанное с
узлами Lmx:

    адрес Lmx  ->  ShortNameId

Таблица сообщает короткое имя узла. Она не сообщает descriptor, type, полный
путь, C layout, lexical depth, callable signature или frame namespace.

При создании каждого именованного runtime-узла реализация регистрирует его
адрес и ShortNameId. Когда merge копирует именованный узел, он регистрирует
новый адрес с тем же ShortNameId. Позиционные или анонимные occurrences
должны либо получать зарезервированный positional ShortNameId в выбранном
ABI, либо быть явно исключены из текстового name lookup; этот выбор открыт в
разделе 14. Скопированный узел является новым ключом; отображение исходного
узла не меняется.

Жизненный цикл таблицы обязан совпадать с жизненным циклом узлов. Мёртвый
адрес не должен позднее разрешаться в устаревшее имя при повторном
использовании памяти.


5.2. What the table is not
Чем таблица не является
-----------------------------

EN

The table is not a namespace. Registering a node does not push a binding,
shadow a caller binding, capture an outer scope, or make a name visible
without a structural path.

There is no runtime operation equivalent to:

* push namespace frame;
* merge callee namespace over caller namespace;
* copy all fields into a namespace;
* restore a namespace on return;
* capture a lexical environment;
* search a stack of active name bindings.

Node names are stable structural facts. Call activity does not reorder or
overlay the side table.

RU

Таблица не является namespace. Регистрация узла не делает push binding, не
shadow-ит binding вызывающего, не захватывает внешний scope и не делает имя
видимым без структурного пути.

В runtime нет операций, эквивалентных следующим:

* push frame namespace;
* merge namespace вызываемого поверх namespace вызывающего;
* копирование всех полей в namespace;
* восстановление namespace при return;
* захват lexical environment;
* поиск по стеку активных name bindings.

Имена узлов являются стабильными структурными фактами. Активность вызовов не
переупорядочивает и не накладывает side table.


5.3. Root-based path lookup
Поиск пути от корня
------------------------

EN

Every arbitrary textual absolute runtime path is resolved from an explicitly
supplied root. This rule does not apply to an already resolved Lmx pointer or a
relative field path.

Conceptually:

1. Receive or derive the explicit root selected by the operation.
2. Convert or parse the requested path into ShortNameId components and
   occurrence selectors.
3. At the current parent, enumerate bounded structural children through
   data and len.
4. Query the side table for each candidate child's ShortNameId.
5. Select the requested occurrence.
6. Continue with the selected child until the path is exhausted.

This is the semantic lookup for an arbitrary textual absolute path even when
the translator emits a faster
equivalent sequence for a constant path. An optimization MUST NOT change the
answer after a runtime merge.

If code already holds an Lmx pointer, that pointer is the resolved value and is
used directly. A relative `field` traversal starts at the supplied containing
Structure. An explicit `node\field` traversal first follows the actual parent
link and then searches that parent's children. None of these operations resets
the start point to root.

Lookup MUST NOT begin in a caller namespace, callee namespace, C lexical
scope, descriptor or per-type field-offset table.

RU

Каждый произвольный текстовый абсолютный runtime-путь разрешается от явно
переданного root. Это правило не относится к уже разрешённому Lmx-указателю
или относительному пути поля.

Концептуальный алгоритм:

1. Получить или вывести явный root, выбранный операцией.
2. Преобразовать или распарсить запрошенный путь в компоненты ShortNameId и
   селекторы occurrence.
3. В текущем родителе перечислить ограниченное множество структурных детей
   через data и len.
4. Получить ShortNameId каждого кандидата из side table.
5. Выбрать запрошенный occurrence.
6. Продолжать с выбранным ребёнком до исчерпания пути.

Это является семантическим lookup произвольного текстового абсолютного пути,
даже тогда, когда транслятор выдаёт более
быструю эквивалентную последовательность для константного пути. Оптимизация
не имеет права менять ответ после runtime merge.

Если код уже имеет Lmx-указатель, этот указатель является разрешённым
значением и используется прямо. Относительный переход `field` начинается от
переданной содержащей Structure. Явный переход `node\field` сначала следует
по настоящей родительской ссылке, затем ищет среди детей этого родителя. Ни
одна из этих операций не сбрасывает начальную точку к root.

Lookup не должен начинаться в namespace вызывающего, namespace вызываемого,
C lexical scope, descriptor или таблице смещений полей конкретного типа.


5.4. Parent-relative access
Доступ относительно родителя
---------------------------------

EN

The explicit source relation node means the parent link stored in Lmx.
Following node is therefore structural navigation, not implicit lexical
capture.

An implementation may combine an explicit upward node step with subsequent
relative path operations, but it MUST preserve the exact source-parent relation
of the concrete runtime copy. It must not restart at root unless the source
operation explicitly requested an absolute root-based path.

RU

Явное отношение исходника node означает родительскую ссылку, записанную в
Lmx. Поэтому переход по node является структурной навигацией, а не неявным
lexical capture.

Реализация может сочетать явный шаг вверх по node с последующими операциями
относительного пути, но обязана сохранять точное отношение родителя исходника
в конкретной runtime-копии. Она не начинает заново с root, если исходная
операция явно не запросила абсолютный путь от root.


5.5. Repeated names
Повторяющиеся имена
------------------------

EN

Children remain ordered, and repeated ShortNameId values are permitted.
Merge MUST preserve all occurrences rather than overwriting a node in place.
The plain spelling of a field must remain an alias for the designated default
occurrence, including the agreed equivalence:

    path\field == path\[0]field

Occurrence numbers follow the ordered child sequence from its beginning.
`[0]` is the first child having that ShortNameId, `[1]` the next, and so on.
A later merge input does not become default merely because it was appended
later. This direction is fixed and must be stable before and after merge.

RU

Дети сохраняют порядок, и повторяющиеся значения ShortNameId разрешены. Merge
обязан сохранять все occurrences, а не заменять узел на месте. Обычная запись
поля должна оставаться псевдонимом выбранного default occurrence, включая
согласованную эквивалентность:

    path\field == path\[0]field

Номера occurrences следуют по упорядоченной последовательности детей от её
начала. `[0]` — первый ребёнок с таким ShortNameId, `[1]` — следующий и так
далее. Более поздний вход merge не становится default только потому, что был
добавлен позже. Это направление закреплено и обязано быть стабильным до и
после merge.


6. Methods and the one-pointer ABI
Методы и ABI с одним указателем
====================================

6.1. Every executable method becomes program-wide reachable code
Каждый исполняемый метод становится достижимым во всей программе кодом
----------------------------------------------------------

EN

Every executable fn or sub body in the current source unit, including a body
nested inside any named or anonymous Structure, MUST produce live C code.
Traversal that emits only top-level bodies is non-conforming.

The generated method implementation must be reachable from any Lmx callable
occurrence in the linked/loaded program. The concrete C linkage may be external
or may be mediated by a generated method pool/registration unit; a translation-
unit-private spelling is conforming only if that mediation still makes its
entry program-wide addressable. It MUST NOT be emitted as an unrelated
zero-returning stub merely because the source method is nested or appears in a
Structure.

The same source definition produces the same deterministic symbol name in
repeatable builds under the same path-normalization profile.

RU

Каждое исполняемое тело fn или sub текущей единицы исходника, включая тело
внутри любой именованной или анонимной Structure, обязано породить живой
C-код. Обход, который эмитит только тела верхнего уровня, не соответствует
архитектуре.

Сгенерированная реализация метода обязана быть достижима из любого
Lmx-callable occurrence в слинкованной/загруженной программе. Конкретный C
linkage может быть external либо опосредован generated method pool / единицей
регистрации; spelling, закрытый внутри translation unit, допустим лишь если
это опосредование всё равно делает entry адресуемым во всей программе. Метод
не должен превращаться в не связанную с телом заглушку, возвращающую ноль,
только потому, что он вложен или находится в Structure.

Одно и то же определение исходника порождает одно и то же детерминированное
имя символа в повторяемых сборках с одинаковым профилем нормализации путей.


6.2. Program-wide path mangling
Mangle полного пути во всей программе
------------------------------------------

EN

A method entry requires a deterministic program-wide unique implementation
identity. The preferred human-readable C spelling is derived from the complete
source path rather than merely the final method word, replacing path separators
with underscores and escaping other invalid C characters. Whatever scheme the
backend selects MUST contain or encode enough normalized information to
distinguish at least:

* source module or file path;
* every containing source Structure component;
* the method's own short name;
* repeated same-name definitions at distinct source positions.

Long names are expected and accepted. The mangling must produce a valid C
identifier and avoid collisions across the whole linked program. It MUST NOT
depend on allocation addresses or translation order.

The exact escaping alphabet, hash fallback and maximum linker-name policy are
UNRESOLVED, but collision freedom and determinism are mandatory.

RU

Вход метода требует детерминированной уникальной во всей программе
implementation identity. Предпочтительный читаемый C-spelling получается из
полного пути исходника, а не только из последнего слова метода: разделители
пути заменяются подчёркиваниями, остальные недопустимые C-символы escaping-ся.
Какая бы схема ни была выбрана backend-ом, она обязана содержать или кодировать
достаточно нормализованной информации, чтобы различать как минимум:

* путь модуля или файла исходника;
* каждый компонент содержащей Structure исходника;
* собственное короткое имя метода;
* повторные одноимённые определения в разных позициях исходника.

Длинные имена ожидаемы и допустимы. Mangling обязан выдавать допустимый
C-идентификатор и исключать коллизии во всей слинкованной программе. Он не
должен зависеть от адресов allocation или порядка трансляции.

Точный escaping alphabet, hash fallback и политика максимальной длины имени
linker-а остаются UNRESOLVED, но отсутствие коллизий и детерминизм
обязательны.


6.3. Exactly one explicit argument
Ровно один явный аргумент
------------------------------

EN

Every generated source method accepts exactly one explicit C argument:

    Lmx *node

The argument is the containing Structure of the callable occurrence: if
`callable` is the selected method node, invocation passes `callable->node`.
The parameter name is not normative; its type, arity and containing-Structure
meaning are. A generated
method MUST NOT expose separate C parameters for source arguments, source
locals, captured values, a second self value, a descriptor, a namespace or an
environment.

All source-semantic inputs needed by the method are reachable as Structure
nodes from the supplied containing Structure and the runtime graph. The exact
conventions for argument, result and failure subtrees are UNRESOLVED, but they
must fit behind this one-pointer boundary.

Backend helpers may use ordinary C parameters internally. That does not allow
the externally generated source-method ABI to grow additional parameters.

Here "hidden argument" means an additional semantic C parameter emitted by the
translator but absent from this one-pointer source-method contract, for example
`LmMessageThread *`, `Arena *`, `ExecutionContext *`, `Namespace *`, a closure
environment, separate source arguments or an output/result pointer. It does not
mean registers/stack details inserted by the platform C ABI, and it does not
forbid private runtime helpers from receiving an arena already derived from the
method's sole Lmx argument. A C return value is a return channel, not an input
argument; its exact form remains section 14.10 work.

RU

Каждый сгенерированный метод исходника принимает ровно один явный аргумент C:

    Lmx *node

Аргументом является содержащая Structure callable-occurrence: если выбранный
узел метода — `callable`, вызов передаёт `callable->node`. Имя параметра не
нормативно; его тип, arity и смысл содержащей Structure нормативны.
Сгенерированный
метод не должен выставлять отдельные C-параметры для аргументов исходника,
локальных значений исходника, captured values, второго self, descriptor,
namespace или environment.

Все входы семантики исходника, необходимые методу, достижимы как узлы
Structure из переданной содержащей Structure и runtime-графа. Точные соглашения для
поддеревьев аргументов, результата и ошибки остаются UNRESOLVED, но обязаны
укладываться за эту границу с одним указателем.

Внутренние backend helpers могут иметь обычные C-параметры. Это не разрешает
расширять внешний ABI сгенерированного метода исходника дополнительными
параметрами.

Здесь «скрытый аргумент» означает дополнительный семантический C-параметр,
который транслятор добавил, хотя его нет в этом однопараметрическом контракте
метода исходника, например `LmMessageThread *`, `Arena *`,
`ExecutionContext *`, `Namespace *`, closure environment, отдельные аргументы
исходника или output/result pointer. Это не означает регистры/детали стека,
которые вводит платформенный C ABI, и не запрещает private runtime helpers
принимать arena, уже определённую по единственному Lmx-аргументу метода.
Возвращаемое C-значение является return channel, а не входным аргументом; его
точная форма остаётся работой раздела 14.10.


6.4. Source locals are Structures
Локальные значения исходника являются Structure
----------------------------------------------------

EN

A source declaration local to a method materializes one or more Lmx nodes
under the execution Structure selected by the final call convention. A
primitive-valued local is still a named Lmx node whose data points to
primitive storage. A Structure-valued local is an Lmx subtree or reference as
defined by the source operation.

The translator MUST NOT replace a source local semantically with:

* an ANSI C automatic scalar;
* a generated C struct local;
* a closure-environment member;
* an entry in a runtime namespace;
* a hidden typed temporary whose lifetime defines source lifetime.

C automatic variables are allowed as short-lived implementation temporaries
for loops, allocation results, address calculations and error propagation.
They are not the storage or identity of a source local.

Recursion and concurrent invocations therefore receive distinct runtime local
nodes even though they execute the same global C method symbol.

RU

Объявление исходника, локальное для метода, материализует один или несколько
Lmx-узлов под Structure исполнения, выбранной окончательным соглашением
вызова. Локальное значение с примитивным payload всё равно является
именованным Lmx-узлом, data которого указывает на примитивное хранилище.
Локальная Structure является поддеревом Lmx или ссылкой согласно операции
исходника.

Транслятор не должен семантически заменять local исходника следующим:

* автоматическим скаляром ANSI C;
* локальным generated C struct;
* member-ом closure environment;
* записью runtime namespace;
* скрытым типизированным temporary, lifetime которого определяет lifetime
  исходника.

Автоматические переменные C разрешены как короткоживущие служебные temporary
для циклов, результатов allocation, вычисления адресов и передачи ошибки.
Они не являются хранилищем или identity local-а исходника.

Поэтому рекурсивные и параллельные вызовы получают разные runtime-узлы
локальных значений, хотя исполняют один и тот же глобальный C-символ метода.


6.5. Common callable physical class
Общая физическая категория callable
----------------------------------------------

EN

All generated source-method entries belong to one common callable physical
class recognized by the runtime. A callable Lmx leaf stores in `data` either a
direct entry address under an ABI that permits it, or a pointer to a callable
record containing the correctly typed entry pointer. The physical class may be
implemented by one or more registered ranges or linker sections; every range
uses the same one-containing-Lmx-pointer semantic invocation ABI.

There is no per-method callable C type in the source ontology and no vtable.
Recognition that a leaf is executable comes from its `data` address-domain
membership. The selected domain operation extracts and invokes the entry; no
descriptor or node tag participates.

Platform glue may use section start/end symbols, a linker script, PE/COFF
section facilities, ELF facilities, Mach-O facilities, or callable-record
indirection. The chosen technique must retain one semantic callable class and
the one-pointer invocation ABI. ISO C portability is not allowed to change the
language ontology; it only selects the concrete domain operation.

RU

Все сгенерированные входы методов исходника принадлежат одной общей
физической категории callable, распознаваемой runtime. Callable-лист Lmx
хранит в `data` либо прямой адрес entry в допускающем это ABI, либо указатель
на callable-record с корректно типизированным указателем entry. Физическая
категория может быть реализована одним или несколькими зарегистрированными
диапазонами/linker sections; все используют единый семантический ABI с одним
указателем на содержащую Lmx.

В онтологии исходника нет отдельного callable C-типа для каждого метода и нет
vtable. То, что лист исполняем, определяется принадлежностью адреса `data`
домену callable. Операция выбранного домена извлекает и вызывает entry; ни
descriptor, ни tag узла не участвуют.

Platform glue может использовать символы начала/конца секции, linker script,
средства секций PE/COFF, ELF, Mach-O либо косвенность через callable record.
Выбранная техника обязана сохранять одну семантическую категорию callable и
ABI вызова с одним указателем. Переносимость ISO C может выбирать конкретную
операцию домена, но не менять онтологию языка.


6.6. Invocation
Вызов
--------------

EN

Conceptually, invocation performs these steps:

1. Resolve the callable node through the runtime tree/path rules.
2. Verify that its data belongs to a range of the common callable physical
   class and resolve its typed entry through that domain operation.
3. Read the callable occurrence's containment parent `callable->node`.
4. Invoke the globally named entry with that containing Structure pointer.
5. Read the source-semantic result or failure from the graph according to the
   final result convention.

No namespace is installed before step 4 and no namespace is restored after
step 4. Context is structural and reachable through Lmx.

A method copied by merge keeps the same global C entry address. Its copied
Lmx placement and rewritten node relation provide the new structural context.
Thus Array.resize code can be present as a field of a runtime HashArray copy
without generating another C implementation.

RU

Концептуально вызов выполняет следующие шаги:

1. Разрешить callable-узел по правилам runtime-дерева и путей.
2. Проверить, что его data входит в диапазон общей физической категории
   callable, и разрешить typed entry через операцию этого домена.
3. Прочитать родителя callable-occurrence: `callable->node`.
4. Вызвать глобально именованный entry с указателем на эту содержащую
   Structure.
5. Прочитать результат или ошибку семантики исходника из графа по
   окончательному соглашению результата.

Перед шагом 4 никакой namespace не устанавливается, а после шага 4 никакой
namespace не восстанавливается. Контекст структурен и достижим через Lmx.

Метод, скопированный merge, сохраняет тот же глобальный C-адрес входа. Его
место в скопированном Lmx и переписанное отношение node дают новый
структурный контекст. Поэтому код Array.resize может присутствовать как поле
runtime-копии HashArray без генерации ещё одной C-реализации.


7. Runtime Structure construction
Построение Structure в runtime
====================================

7.1. No generated static Structure instances
Нет сгенерированных статических instance Structure
-------------------------------------------------------

EN

Source Structures are materialized at runtime. The translator MUST NOT emit a
static C instance whose member layout is the permanent meaning of a source
Structure.

Global substrate such as all_chars, linker method sections, immutable source
bytes or generated C functions is not thereby a static source Structure. The
prohibition concerns prebuilt semantic Structure instances and their
per-Structure layouts.

When execution does not reach a Structure-producing expression, that runtime
Structure is not materialized merely because its source declaration was
translated.

RU

Structure исходника материализуются в runtime. Транслятор не должен выдавать
статический C instance, layout members которого является постоянным смыслом
Structure исходника.

Глобальный субстрат, такой как all_chars, linker section методов,
неизменяемые байты исходника или сгенерированные C-функции, не становится от
этого статической Structure исходника. Запрет относится к заранее
построенным семантическим instance Structure и их отдельным layouts.

Если исполнение не дошло до выражения, производящего Structure, такая
runtime-Structure не материализуется только потому, что её объявление было
переведено.


7.2. Stable node addresses
Стабильные адреса узлов
----------------------------

EN

The node parent link and the ShortNameId side table make the Lmx address part
of live runtime identity. Therefore a live node MUST NOT move without
rewriting all references and its side-table key.

In particular, growing a child sequence with an ordinary realloc that moves
embedded Lmx nodes is invalid unless no reference can observe the old
addresses and every node relationship and table key is rebuilt atomically.
Allocation occurs in the owning Message's arena. The initial implementation
SHOULD prefer stable blocks in that arena or fresh tree construction.

RU

Родительская ссылка node и side table ShortNameId делают адрес Lmx частью
живой runtime identity. Поэтому живой узел нельзя перемещать без
переписывания всех ссылок и его ключа в side table.

В частности, увеличение последовательности детей обычным realloc, который
перемещает встроенные Lmx-узлы, недопустимо, если старые адреса могут
наблюдаться и все отношения node и ключи таблицы не перестраиваются атомарно.
Allocation происходит в arena Message-владельца. Начальная реализация должна
предпочесть стабильные блоки этой arena или построение нового дерева.


7.3. Primitive leaves
Примитивные листья
-----------------------

EN

A primitive leaf remains an Lmx node. Only its payload is primitive storage.
For an interned immutable primitive such as a character, copying the Lmx node
copies the pointer to the canonical primitive cell.

Writing a source variable represented by such a node changes which primitive
cell its data references; it MUST NOT mutate the shared all_chars cell.

The copy policy for mutable, non-interned or opaque primitive storage is
UNRESOLVED. It must be specified per physical range without adding a
per-Structure descriptor.

RU

Примитивный лист остаётся Lmx-узлом. Только его payload является примитивным
хранилищем. Для interned immutable примитива, например символа, копирование
Lmx-узла копирует указатель на каноническую ячейку примитива.

Запись source variable, представленной таким узлом, меняет то, на какую
примитивную ячейку ссылается data; она не должна изменять общую ячейку
all_chars.

Политика копирования mutable, non-interned или opaque примитивного хранилища
остаётся UNRESOLVED. Она должна определяться для физического диапазона без
добавления descriptor конкретной Structure.


7.4. One Message arena and payload placement
Одна arena Message и размещение payload
-------------------------------------------

EN

Every Message owns exactly one logical arena. The arena is the semantic memory
boundary of that Message and remains attached to it when the Message is
scheduled as an L3 Thread or migrates between host workers. "One arena" does
not require one contiguous homogeneous allocation: the arena may own a list of
stable blocks and several disjoint registered address ranges.

The arena contains every mutable or dynamically constructed source-semantic
value owned by the Message:

* Lmx occurrence headers for Structures, fields, methods, arguments, results
  and source locals;
* branch/child storage addressed by Structure `data`;
* non-interned primitive cells constructed for that Message;
* ordinary Array headers, shapes, elements and backing storage once the exact
  Array payload ABI is fixed;
* runtime merge results and every fresh occurrence copied into them;
* Message envelope, continuation and other source-visible state represented as
  Lmx nodes.

Immutable program-wide substrate is not duplicated merely to satisfy arena
ownership. `all_chars`, immutable intern pools, generated method code and
immutable method records may live in registered global ranges. The Lmx
occurrence which refers to such substrate still belongs to its Message arena.
Mutable foreign storage is represented only by an explicit L2 handle and its
declared lifetime/synchronization contract.

An implementation may recover the owning arena from the address range
containing the supplied `Lmx *`, or from equivalent allocator metadata. A
generated source method therefore allocates relative to the arena of its
single `containing_structure` argument; it does not receive a hidden arena,
MessageThread or allocator parameter. Address-range-to-arena/domain metadata
classifies storage regions and is not another per-node semantic table.

Migration note: the current hosted runtime has a canonical Message
`root_owner` plus a registry of additional `LmOwnArena` allocation shells and
passes MessageThread/arena state through generated helpers. For Revision 2 the
registry is interpreted/refactored as physical blocks/ranges of one logical
Message arena. The extra shells and hidden generated arguments are not multiple
semantic arenas and are not the final source-method ABI.

RU

Каждый Message владеет ровно одной логической arena. Arena является
семантической границей памяти этого Message и остаётся связанной с ним, когда
Message планируется как L3 Thread либо мигрирует между host workers. «Одна
arena» не означает одно непрерывное однородное allocation: arena может владеть
списком стабильных блоков и несколькими непересекающимися зарегистрированными
диапазонами адресов.

В arena находятся все изменяемые или динамически построенные source-semantic
значения, принадлежащие Message:

* заголовки occurrences Lmx для Structures, полей, методов, аргументов,
  результатов и locals исходника;
* хранилище ветвей/детей, адресуемое `data` Structure;
* не-interned ячейки примитивов, построенные для этого Message;
* заголовки, shape, элементы и backing storage обычных Arrays после фиксации
  точного ABI Array payload;
* результаты runtime merge и все свежие occurrences, скопированные в них;
* envelope Message, continuations и другое видимое исходнику состояние,
  представленное Lmx-узлами.

Неизменяемый глобальный субстрат программы не дублируется только ради arena
ownership. `all_chars`, immutable intern pools, сгенерированный код методов и
неизменяемые method records могут лежать в зарегистрированных глобальных
диапазонах. Ссылающийся на такой субстрат occurrence Lmx всё равно принадлежит
arena своего Message. Изменяемое foreign storage представляется только явным
L2 handle с объявленным контрактом lifetime/synchronization.

Реализация может определить arena-владельца по диапазону адреса, содержащему
переданный `Lmx *`, либо по эквивалентным metadata allocator-а. Поэтому
сгенерированный метод исходника выделяет память относительно arena своего
единственного аргумента `containing_structure`; скрытый параметр arena,
MessageThread или allocator ему не передаётся. Metadata
address-range-to-arena/domain классифицируют области хранения и не являются
другой семантической per-node таблицей.

Примечание о миграции: текущий hosted runtime имеет канонический Message
`root_owner`, registry дополнительных allocation shells `LmOwnArena` и
протаскивает состояние MessageThread/arena через generated helpers. Для
Revision 2 этот registry трактуется/рефакторится как физические blocks/ranges
одной логической arena Message. Дополнительные shells и скрытые generated
arguments не являются несколькими семантическими arena и не являются
финальным ABI методов исходника.


8. Runtime merge
Runtime merge
================

8.1. Execution-time operation
Операция времени исполнения
--------------------------------

EN

merge is executed only when control reaches the source operation containing
that merge. It is not a translator invocation, compiler callback, directory
scan, descriptor composition or link-time layout operation.

The translated C at that source site calls the generic runtime merge over
runtime Lmx values. The merge implementation needs no C knowledge of Array,
HashArray or any other source Structure name.

Consequently:

* a merge in an untaken branch performs no copy;
* a merge in a method runs when that method reaches it;
* a runtime merge result can be supplied to another runtime merge;
* no language-level new operation is required;
* construction happens because merge itself is a value-producing runtime
  operation.

RU

merge выполняется только тогда, когда управление дошло до содержащей его
операции исходника. Он не является вызовом транслятора, callback компилятора,
сканированием директории, композицией descriptors или link-time операцией
layout.

Сгенерированный C в этом месте исходника вызывает общий runtime merge над
runtime-значениями Lmx. Реализации merge не требуется C-знание об Array,
HashArray или имени любой другой Structure исходника.

Следовательно:

* merge в непройденной ветке ничего не копирует;
* merge внутри метода работает тогда, когда этот метод дошёл до него;
* результат runtime merge можно передать следующему runtime merge;
* отдельная операция языка new не требуется;
* создание происходит потому, что merge сам является производящей значение
  runtime-операцией.


8.2. Copy, do not connect
Копировать, а не соединять
-------------------------------

EN

merge creates a new result root. For every operand from left to right it copies
the operand root's direct children, in order, beneath the new result root; it
does not insert the operand root itself as an extra named child. It then copies
the explicit vertical merge body according to the same ordered rule. Thus
merging Array into HashArray produces `HashArray\resize`, not
`HashArray\Array\resize` merely because Array was an operand.

It MUST NOT implement composition by placing links to the source tree where
copied nodes are required. For each copied containment node:

1. allocate a distinct Lmx node;
2. copy or construct its len and data according to the physical range;
3. register the new Lmx address with the source node's ShortNameId when that
   occurrence participates in named lookup (or apply the selected positional
   convention);
4. set node to the corresponding parent in the new tree;
5. recursively copy its contained children;
6. preserve the ordered field sequence and repeated names.

The source tree remains valid and unchanged. Mutation of structural fields in
the result must not mutate the corresponding source tree merely because merge
was implemented with links.

What to do with explicit non-node reference edges whose target lies inside or
outside the copied subtree is UNRESOLVED in section 14. This question does not
permit replacing the required containment copy with a link.

RU

merge создаёт новый root результата. Для каждого operand слева направо он
копирует прямых детей root-а operand-а, по порядку, под новый root результата;
сам root operand-а не вставляется дополнительным именованным ребёнком. Затем
по тому же упорядоченному правилу копируется явное вертикальное тело merge.
Поэтому merge Array в HashArray даёт `HashArray\resize`, а не
`HashArray\Array\resize` только из-за того, что Array был operand-ом.

Он не должен реализовывать композицию размещением ссылок на исходное дерево
там, где требуются скопированные узлы. Для каждого копируемого узла
вложенности:

1. выделить отдельный Lmx-узел;
2. скопировать или построить его len и data по правилу физического диапазона;
3. зарегистрировать новый адрес Lmx с ShortNameId исходного узла, если
   occurrence участвует в именованном lookup (либо применить выбранное
   positional-соглашение);
4. установить node в соответствующего родителя нового дерева;
5. рекурсивно скопировать вложенных детей;
6. сохранить упорядоченную последовательность полей и повторяющиеся имена.

Исходное дерево остаётся допустимым и неизменным. Изменение структурных полей
результата не должно менять соответствующее исходное дерево только потому,
что merge был реализован ссылками.

Поведение явных не-node рёбер-ссылок, цель которых находится внутри или вне
копируемого поддерева, остаётся UNRESOLVED в разделе 14. Этот вопрос не
разрешает заменять требуемую копию дерева вложенности ссылкой.


8.3. Ordered composition
Упорядоченная композиция
-----------------------------

EN

merge preserves source ordering. Multiple input trees are consumed in their
source-specified order, and the explicit merge body is placed according to
the language's ordered merge rule. Equal ShortNameId values remain separate
occurrences.

For any repeated ShortNameId, `[0]` is the first occurrence in this result
order, `[1]` is the next, and so on. Appending a later operand never changes
which preserved earlier occurrence is selected by the unqualified name.

No occurrence is deleted, renamed or overwritten merely to fit a C struct
member namespace. Runtime lookup selects among the preserved occurrences.

RU

merge сохраняет порядок исходника. Несколько входных деревьев потребляются в
заданном исходником порядке, а явное тело merge размещается по
упорядоченному правилу merge языка. Одинаковые ShortNameId остаются
отдельными occurrences.

Для каждого повторённого ShortNameId `[0]` является первым occurrence в этом
порядке результата, `[1]` — следующим и так далее. Добавление более позднего
operand никогда не меняет того, какой сохранённый ранний occurrence выбирает
обычное имя.

Ни один occurrence не удаляется, не переименовывается и не перезаписывается
только ради соответствия namespace members в C struct. Runtime lookup
выбирает среди сохранённых occurrences.


8.4. HashArray / Array consequence
Следствие для HashArray / Array
------------------------------------

EN

Suppose Array declares runtime fields and methods, and HashArray contains a
merge that consumes Array.

Translation of HashArray emits the HashArray source bodies and a runtime
merge call. It does not embed a statically expanded Array layout in
HashArray.

Before execution reaches that merge, the runtime HashArray result containing
Array's copied nodes does not exist. When execution reaches it, merge copies
the Array tree and installs copied method nodes in the new HashArray tree.
Those method nodes carry callable payloads resolving to the already compiled
program-wide reachable Array method entries.

The machine code must already be linked or loaded before it can be invoked.
The phrase code appears in HashArray means that a callable Lmx node with that
entry address appears in the new runtime tree. It does not mean that merge
invokes a compiler or generates machine instructions.

RU

Пусть Array объявляет runtime-поля и методы, а HashArray содержит merge,
потребляющий Array.

Трансляция HashArray выдаёт тела исходника HashArray и runtime-вызов merge.
Она не встраивает статически раскрытый layout Array в HashArray.

До того как исполнение дошло до этого merge, runtime-результата HashArray,
содержащего скопированные узлы Array, не существует. Когда исполнение доходит
до merge, он копирует дерево Array и помещает скопированные узлы методов в
новое дерево HashArray. Эти узлы методов указывают на уже скомпилированные
глобальные входы методов Array в общей секции методов.

Машинный код обязан быть слинкован или загружен до вызова. Фраза «код
появляется в HashArray» означает, что callable-узел Lmx с этим адресом входа
появляется в новом runtime-дереве. Она не означает, что merge вызывает
компилятор или генерирует машинные инструкции.


9. No runtime namespace
Отсутствие runtime namespace
================================

9.1. Final decision
Окончательное решение
--------------------------

EN

Runtime name visibility is not implemented by a mutable namespace table.
There is no name-to-stack-of-values structure populated on method entry.
There is no merge of caller and callee namespace state. There is no reverse
pop on return.

The graph, its root, node parent relations, child ordering and ShortNameId
mapping contain all runtime structural information used for lookup.

Compile-time translator tables used while consuming the parser tree are
implementation working data, not runtime language values. They must not leak
into emitted code as the old namespace architecture.

RU

Runtime-видимость имён не реализуется изменяемой таблицей namespace. Нет
структуры name-to-stack-of-values, заполняемой при входе в метод. Нет merge
состояния namespace вызывающего и вызываемого. Нет обратного pop при return.

Граф, его корень, отношения родителей node, порядок детей и отображение
ShortNameId содержат всю runtime-структурную информацию, используемую lookup.

Compile-time таблицы транслятора, используемые при потреблении дерева
parser-а, являются служебными данными реализации, а не runtime-значениями
языка. Они не должны просачиваться в выдаваемый код как старая архитектура
namespace.


9.2. Consequences
Следствия
--------------

EN

Because there is no runtime namespace:

* method entry and return require no namespace cleanup;
* recursion does not clone or stack namespace tables;
* concurrent calls do not contend on a global visible-name table;
* a method cannot accidentally see a caller local through a name overlay;
* visibility is expressed by structural paths;
* explicit node traversal has one concrete meaning;
* merge changes a tree and its available paths, not a namespace.

The ShortNameId side table may be implemented with hashing for performance,
but that does not make it a namespace: its key is a concrete node address and
its value never changes because of call nesting.

RU

Поскольку runtime namespace отсутствует:

* вход в метод и return не требуют cleanup namespace;
* рекурсия не копирует и не складывает в стек таблицы namespace;
* параллельные вызовы не конкурируют за глобальную таблицу видимых имён;
* метод не может случайно увидеть local вызывающего через overlay имён;
* видимость выражается структурными путями;
* явный переход node имеет один конкретный смысл;
* merge меняет дерево и доступные в нём пути, а не namespace.

Side table ShortNameId может использовать hashing для производительности, но
от этого она не становится namespace: её ключом является конкретный адрес
узла, а значение не меняется из-за вложенности вызовов.


9.3. L3 Message concurrency is semantic
L3 Message-конкурентность является семантикой
------------------------------------------------

EN

The scalable concurrency unit of common LMX is a Message. A Message owns one
arena and, while admitted for execution, is an L3 Thread. Each L3 Thread has an
ordered FIFO inbox and stages outgoing Messages in FIFO order. It executes at
most one turn at a time; one turn consumes at most one admitted input Message,
updates only state owned by that Message arena, stages output and reaches the
common turn boundary. Another turn of the same L3 Thread cannot overlap it.

At that boundary a successful turn publishes its staged outbox in FIFO order;
a failed turn rolls the staged outbox back. The current inbox item and
turn-local roots are then released as required, and collection runs locally for
that Message arena. Ordinary `return`, loop transfer or nested call return is
not a collection boundary. Termination completes the final boundary and then
releases the Message arena after surviving transfers and explicit resource
cleanup.

Different L3 Threads may run concurrently. They may be mapped to one
cooperative host loop, a fixed worker pool or other host machinery and may move
between workers from turn to turn. That mapping is not source-visible, but the
one-arena ownership, FIFO order and absence of overlapping turns for one L3
Thread are source-semantic guarantees.

This is why common L3 requires no portable shared-memory synchronization
algorithm. Mutable Lmx nodes of one running Message are not directly mutated by
another running Message. Interaction is an explicit Message transfer. A
transport may be an in-process queue, HTTP, a file, radio or physical mail;
transport latency and representation do not change the Message boundary.

L2 may deliberately expose a raw OS thread, shared address, atomic, mutex,
condition or custom scheduler. Such a program must state and prove its own
memory, ordering, cancellation and lifetime rules. It is a low-level individual
engineering solution, not a synchronization rule that can be lifted into
common LMX or Mix.

Consequently the procedural Java Mix implementation must not be preserved by
translating its locks and independently running cursor threads one-for-one.
Mix's portable/common operations, cursors, mirrors and mutations must be
re-expressed as Message-owned state and FIFO Message interactions. Optional
distributed coordination protocols may themselves be explicit Messages, but
no local Java mutex or OS-thread identity becomes Mix semantics.

RU

Единицей масштабируемой конкурентности общего LMX является Message. Message
владеет одной arena и во время допуска к исполнению является L3 Thread. Каждый
L3 Thread имеет упорядоченный FIFO inbox и подготавливает исходящие Messages в
FIFO-порядке. Он исполняет не более одного turn одновременно; один turn
потребляет не более одного допущенного входного Message, изменяет только
состояние, принадлежащее arena этого Message, подготавливает выход и достигает
общей границы turn. Другой turn того же L3 Thread не может пересекаться с ним.

На этой границе успешный turn публикует подготовленный outbox в FIFO-порядке,
а failed turn откатывает его. Затем освобождаются текущий inbox item и
turn-local roots, когда это требуется, и локально запускается collection arena
этого Message. Обычный `return`, переход цикла или return вложенного вызова не
является границей collection. Termination завершает последнюю границу и затем
освобождает arena Message после surviving transfers и явного cleanup ресурсов.

Разные L3 Threads могут работать параллельно. Они могут отображаться на один
кооперативный host loop, фиксированный worker pool или другой host-механизм и
переезжать между workers от turn к turn. Это отображение не видно исходнику, но
владение одной arena, FIFO-порядок и отсутствие пересекающихся turns одного L3
Thread являются гарантиями исходной семантики.

Именно поэтому общему L3 не требуется переносимый алгоритм shared-memory
синхронизации. Изменяемые Lmx-узлы одного исполняемого Message не изменяются
напрямую другим исполняемым Message. Взаимодействие является явной передачей
Message. Транспортом может быть внутрипроцессная очередь, HTTP, файл, радио или
физическая почта; задержка и представление транспорта не меняют границу
Message.

L2 может намеренно открыть raw OS thread, общий адрес, atomic, mutex, condition
или custom scheduler. Такая программа обязана сама задать и доказать правила
памяти, порядка, cancellation и lifetime. Это низкоуровневое индивидуальное
инженерное решение, а не правило синхронизации, которое можно поднять в общий
LMX или Mix.

Следовательно, процедурную Java-реализацию Mix нельзя сохранять посредством
буквального переноса её локов и независимо работающих cursor threads.
Переносимые/общие операции, курсоры, зеркала и изменения Mix должны быть
выражены заново как принадлежащее Messages состояние и FIFO-взаимодействия
Messages. Необязательные протоколы распределённой координации сами могут быть
явными Messages, но локальный Java mutex или identity OS-thread не становится
семантикой Mix.


10. Required conceptual runtime operations
Обязательные концептуальные операции runtime
================================================

EN

The exact C spellings are not fixed, but the runtime must provide the
equivalent of these operations:

1. Allocate a stable Lmx node or bounded Lmx subtree.
2. Establish and validate the node parent relation.
3. Register Lmx pointer to ShortNameId.
4. Remove or invalidate that registration at end of lifetime.
5. Derive the owning Message and its one arena from an Lmx address/root or
   equivalent allocation-range metadata, without a generated-method argument.
6. Find root by following node.
7. Classify data by address range.
8. Enumerate structural children using data and len.
9. Find a child occurrence by ShortNameId.
10. Resolve an arbitrary textual absolute path from an explicit root, and a
   relative path from its supplied Structure.
11. Resolve a callable-domain payload and invoke its entry with exactly
    `callable->node`.
12. Copy a containment tree while rebasing node and copying name IDs.
13. Merge ordered runtime trees and a runtime body into a fresh result in the
    current Message arena.
14. Admit incoming Messages into a per-L3-Thread FIFO, execute no more than one
    turn of the same L3 Thread concurrently, and publish staged output in FIFO
    order.
15. At the common end-turn boundary, publish or roll back the outbox first and
    then collect the owning Message arena; release the arena at Message
    termination after required transfer/cleanup.

These operations may be fused or specialized. Their observable behavior may
not depend on a per-Structure descriptor, C typedef or runtime namespace.

RU

Точные имена в C не закреплены, но runtime обязан предоставлять эквивалент
следующих операций:

1. Выделить стабильный Lmx-узел или ограниченное поддерево Lmx.
2. Установить и проверить родительское отношение node.
3. Зарегистрировать Lmx pointer в ShortNameId.
4. Удалить или инвалидировать регистрацию в конце lifetime.
5. Определить Message-владельца и его единственную arena по адресу/root Lmx
   либо эквивалентным metadata диапазона allocation, не добавляя аргумент
   сгенерированного метода.
6. Найти root последовательным переходом node.
7. Классифицировать data по диапазону адреса.
8. Перечислить структурных детей с помощью data и len.
9. Найти occurrence ребёнка по ShortNameId.
10. Разрешить произвольный текстовый абсолютный путь от явно переданного root,
   а относительный путь — от переданной Structure.
11. Разрешить callable-payload по его физической категории и вызвать его entry
    ровно с `callable->node`.
12. Скопировать дерево вложенности с rebasing node и копированием name ID.
13. Смержить упорядоченные runtime-деревья и runtime-тело в новый результат в
    текущей arena Message.
14. Принимать входящие Messages в FIFO каждого L3 Thread, не исполнять
    одновременно более одного turn того же L3 Thread и публиковать
    подготовленный выход в FIFO-порядке.
15. На общей границе end-turn сначала публиковать либо откатывать outbox, затем
    выполнять collection arena Message-владельца; при termination освобождать
    arena после обязательного transfer/cleanup.

Эти операции можно объединять или специализировать. Их наблюдаемое поведение
не может зависеть от descriptor конкретной Structure, C typedef или runtime
namespace.


11. Translator pipeline required by this architecture
Pipeline транслятора, требуемый архитектурой
================================================

11.1. Structural outline
Структурная схема
----------------------

EN

The replacement core has the following conceptual stages:

1. Receive the unchanged parser tree.
2. Walk the complete current source unit recursively.
3. Assign deterministic ShortNameId values or references to the short-name
   identity mechanism.
4. Assign a deterministic collision-free program-wide method identity to every
   executable body, preferably a complete-path-mangled C spelling.
5. Emit declarations/registration needed to make every method entry reachable
   through the common callable physical class.
6. Emit every method body using the one-containing-Structure-pointer ABI and
   generic runtime structural operations.
7. Emit runtime builders/evaluators for source Structure expressions and
   source locals.
8. Preserve merge as a runtime call at its execution position.
9. Emit registration of newly constructed named nodes in the sole side table.
10. Emit direct-reference and relative structural traversal where the source
    has a resolved/current Lmx pointer; emit root-based traversal only for an
    explicitly absolute/arbitrary textual path. Never emit ordinary Structure
    access as a generated C member access.
11. Make method entries available through the common callable physical class.

This outline does not require multiple compiler passes with these exact
names. It specifies information flow and effects.

RU

Новое ядро имеет следующие концептуальные стадии:

1. Получить неизменённое дерево parser-а.
2. Рекурсивно обойти всю текущую единицу исходника.
3. Назначить детерминированные ShortNameId или ссылки на механизм identity
   короткого имени.
4. Назначить каждому исполняемому телу метода детерминированный C-символ,
   mangled из полного пути.
5. Выдать объявления глобально видимых входов методов.
6. Выдать каждое тело метода по ABI с одним Lmx-указателем и общими
   структурными runtime-операциями.
7. Выдать runtime builders/evaluators для выражений Structure и locals
   исходника.
8. Сохранить merge как runtime-вызов в его позиции исполнения.
9. Выдать регистрацию новых именованных узлов в единственной side table.
10. Выдать direct-reference и относительный структурный traversal там, где
    исходник имеет разрешённый/current Lmx-указатель; traversal от root
    выдавать только для явно абсолютного/произвольного текстового пути.
    Обычный доступ к Structure никогда не выдавать как generated C member.
11. Сделать входы методов доступными через общую физическую категорию
    callable.

Эта схема не требует compiler passes именно с такими названиями. Она задаёт
поток информации и эффекты.


11.2. Static knowledge the translator may use
Допустимое статическое знание транслятора
----------------------------------------------

EN

Rejecting static Structure type analysis does not require the translator to
forget syntax. It may and must know:

* the parser-tree nesting and source positions;
* the spelling of path components;
* which parsed forms define executable bodies;
* the source order of children and merge inputs;
* constant ShortNameId values for constant path components;
* which program-wide method identity/entry implements a source method;
* which runtime helper implements a source operation.

It must not turn that knowledge into a mandatory closed C layout for a
Structure. Syntax knowledge selects generic runtime operations; it does not
create source-level C types.

RU

Отказ от статического анализа типа Structure не требует, чтобы транслятор
забыл синтаксис. Он может и обязан знать:

* вложенность дерева parser-а и позиции исходника;
* spelling компонентов пути;
* какие распарсенные формы определяют исполняемые тела;
* порядок детей и входов merge в исходнике;
* константные ShortNameId константных компонентов пути;
* какой глобальный C-символ реализует метод исходника;
* какой runtime helper реализует операцию исходника.

Он не должен превращать это знание в обязательный закрытый C-layout
Structure. Знание синтаксиса выбирает общие runtime-операции, а не создаёт
C-типы уровня исходника.


11.3. Nested callable emission
Эмиссия вложенных callable
-------------------------------

EN

The recursive source walk must treat an executable body as executable
regardless of its nesting depth. A method nested in Array receives its own
global path-mangled implementation symbol.

The node created for that method at runtime stores a callable-domain payload in
data which resolves to the method entry. The node's ShortNameId is stored only
in the side table. Its node link records its concrete parent in that runtime
tree.

A descriptor-only callable declaration without a body must not silently
receive a fake executable implementation. Its exact non-executable runtime
form is UNRESOLVED if not already specified elsewhere.

RU

Рекурсивный обход исходника обязан считать исполняемое тело исполняемым
независимо от глубины вложенности. Метод внутри Array получает собственный
глобальный path-mangled символ реализации.

Узел, создаваемый для этого метода в runtime, хранит в data payload callable-
домена, который разрешается в entry метода. ShortNameId узла хранится только в
side table. Его ссылка node записывает конкретного родителя в этом
runtime-дереве.

Callable-декларация без тела, содержащая только описание, не должна молча
получать фальшивую исполняемую реализацию. Её точная неисполняемая
runtime-форма остаётся UNRESOLVED, если не определена отдельно.


12. Prohibited implementation shortcuts
Запрещённые сокращения реализации
======================================

EN

The following are explicitly non-conforming:

1. Generating one typedef struct per named source Structure.
2. Placing a descriptor pointer, tag or name inside every Lmx node.
3. Emitting field access as a fixed C member offset that fails after dynamic
   merge.
4. Treating fn or sub inside a Structure as metadata while omitting its body.
5. Generating a zero-returning stub for an un-emitted nested method.
6. Translating merge by concatenating C member declarations.
7. Performing merge during translation or program startup when source
   control has not reached it.
8. Representing a merge result as references to source containment children
   instead of a new copied tree.
9. Giving generated methods one C parameter per source argument or local.
10. Storing source locals only in automatic C variables.
11. Creating closure structs or lexical-environment structs as the semantic
    representation of nested methods.
12. Implementing lookup with a runtime namespace stack or overlay.
13. Adding a second per-node metadata map for type, descriptor, layout, path,
    owner or callable signature.
14. Looking up an arbitrary textual absolute path relative to whichever C
    function happens to be executing instead of using its explicitly supplied
    Lmx root. This prohibition does not redirect relative/direct-reference
    traversal to root.
15. Giving method symbols short names that can collide across files or
    nested Structures.
16. Depending on a whole-directory translation scan to know the shape of a
    merge input.
17. Calling a compiler from runtime merge.
18. Classifying a data payload by a per-Structure generated type rather than
    its address range.

RU

Следующее явно не соответствует архитектуре:

1. Генерация отдельного typedef struct для каждой именованной Structure.
2. Размещение descriptor pointer, tag или имени внутри каждого Lmx-узла.
3. Эмиссия доступа к полю как фиксированного C member offset, перестающего
   работать после динамического merge.
4. Обращение с fn или sub внутри Structure как с metadata при пропуске тела.
5. Генерация возвращающей ноль заглушки вместо неэмитированного вложенного
   метода.
6. Трансляция merge конкатенацией объявлений C members.
7. Выполнение merge во время трансляции или старта программы, когда
   управление исходника до него не дошло.
8. Представление результата merge ссылками на исходных детей вложенности
   вместо нового скопированного дерева.
9. Отдельный C-параметр сгенерированного метода на каждый аргумент или local
   исходника.
10. Хранение local исходника только в автоматической переменной C.
11. Создание closure structs или lexical-environment structs как
    семантического представления вложенных методов.
12. Реализация lookup стеком или overlay runtime namespace.
13. Добавление второй per-node map для type, descriptor, layout, path, owner
    или callable signature.
14. Поиск произвольного текстового абсолютного пути относительно случайно
    исполняемой C-функции вместо использования явно переданного root Lmx. Этот
    запрет не перенаправляет относительный/direct-reference traversal к root.
15. Короткие имена символов методов, способные столкнуться между файлами или
    вложенными Structure.
16. Зависимость от сканирования всей директории для знания shape входа
    merge.
17. Вызов компилятора из runtime merge.
18. Классификация payload data по generated type конкретной Structure вместо
    диапазона адреса.


13. Conformance examples and required tests
Примеры соответствия и обязательные тесты
=============================================

13.1. Uniform primitive leaf
Единый примитивный лист
----------------------------

EN

Given a char field containing exclamation mark:

* the field itself is an Lmx node;
* its node points to its concrete containing parent;
* its Lmx address maps to the ShortNameId for char;
* its data points at all_chars['!'];
* no char member is embedded in a generated Structure typedef;
* copying the tree creates a new field Lmx and copies the canonical character
  pointer.

RU

Для поля char, содержащего восклицательный знак:

* само поле является Lmx-узлом;
* его node указывает на конкретного содержащего родителя;
* адрес его Lmx отображается в ShortNameId для char;
* его data указывает на all_chars['!'];
* member char не встраивается в generated typedef Structure;
* копирование дерева создаёт новый Lmx поля и копирует указатель на
  канонический символ.


13.2. Nested live method
Живой вложенный метод
--------------------------

EN

A method Array/resize nested inside Array must:

* produce one program-wide reachable C entry with a deterministic unique name,
  preferably including the source unit and Array/resize path;
* be available through the common callable physical class;
* accept exactly one Lmx pointer;
* have its actual source body emitted;
* be referenced by the callable-domain payload in `data` of its runtime method
  node;
* execute the real body when resolved and invoked.

A test that merely finds a similarly named C stub is insufficient.

RU

Метод Array/resize внутри Array обязан:

* породить один достижимый во всей программе C-entry с детерминированным
  уникальным именем, предпочтительно включающим единицу исходника и путь
  Array/resize;
* быть доступным через общую физическую категорию callable;
* принимать ровно один Lmx pointer;
* иметь сэмитированное настоящее тело исходника;
* адресоваться через callable-domain payload в `data` его runtime-узла метода;
* исполнять настоящее тело при разрешении пути и вызове.

Теста, который только находит похожую по имени C-заглушку, недостаточно.


13.3. Runtime HashArray merge
Runtime merge HashArray
----------------------------

EN

A conformance test must demonstrate:

1. Translating HashArray does not emit a HashArray C struct containing Array
   members.
2. Before control reaches merge, no merged HashArray tree has been allocated.
3. Reaching merge allocates a new tree.
4. Array's direct children are copied directly under the HashArray result root;
   no additional Array root child is inserted.
5. Every copied child's node points into the new tree.
6. Every named copied node has the correct ShortNameId side-table entry, with
   the selected positional convention applied to unnamed occurrences.
7. Array method nodes in the result retain callable payloads resolving to the
   original compiled methods.
8. Invoking a copied Array method calls the entry with exactly
   `copied_callable->node`, the new HashArray containing Structure.
9. The source Array tree remains structurally unchanged.
10. The resulting HashArray can itself be an input to another merge.

RU

Тест соответствия обязан показать:

1. Трансляция HashArray не выдаёт C struct HashArray с members Array.
2. До достижения merge управление не выделяло merged-дерево HashArray.
3. Достижение merge выделяет новое дерево.
4. Прямые дети Array копируются непосредственно под root результата
   HashArray; дополнительный ребёнок-root Array не вставляется.
5. node каждого скопированного ребёнка указывает внутрь нового дерева.
6. Каждый именованный скопированный узел имеет правильную запись ShortNameId
   в side table; к безымянным применяется выбранное positional-соглашение.
7. Узлы методов Array в результате сохраняют callable payloads, разрешаемые в
   исходные скомпилированные методы.
8. Вызов скопированного метода вызывает entry ровно с
   `copied_callable->node`, новой содержащей Structure HashArray.
9. Исходное дерево Array структурно не меняется.
10. Получившийся HashArray сам может быть входом следующего merge.


13.4. Root lookup
Поиск от корня
-------------------

EN

A path test must create at least three nested levels, supply the same explicit
root and arbitrary textual absolute path from method contexts at different
depths, and obtain the same root-selected node. A separate test must prove that
relative access begins at `callable->node`, and that `node\field` follows the
actual parent rather than resetting to root. Both must continue to pass after a
runtime merge adds repeated short names.

The test must fail if lookup is accidentally implemented using C lexical
locals or an active namespace stack.

RU

Тест пути обязан создать как минимум три уровня вложенности, передать один и
тот же явный root и произвольный текстовый абсолютный путь из контекстов
методов на разной глубине и получить один и тот же выбранный от корня узел.
Отдельный тест обязан доказать, что относительный доступ начинается от
`callable->node`, а `node\field` следует по настоящему родителю, не
сбрасываясь к root. Оба обязаны продолжать работать после runtime merge,
добавляющего повторные короткие имена.

Тест должен обнаруживать ошибку, если lookup случайно реализован через
лексические locals C или стек активного namespace.


13.5. Source locals
Локальные значения исходника
--------------------------------

EN

A recursive-method test must show that:

* each invocation creates distinct Lmx nodes for source locals;
* each local has the correct node parent;
* each named local has a side-table mapping;
* an inner invocation cannot overwrite an outer invocation's local by
  sharing a C automatic as semantic storage;
* no runtime namespace is required to restore visibility on return.

RU

Тест рекурсивного метода обязан показать:

* каждый вызов создаёт отдельные Lmx-узлы locals исходника;
* каждый local имеет правильного родителя node;
* каждый именованный local имеет отображение side table;
* внутренний вызов не может перезаписать local внешнего вызова из-за общего
  C automatic как семантического хранилища;
* для восстановления видимости при return не требуется runtime namespace.


13.6. Generated-C structural checks
Структурные проверки сгенерированного C
-------------------------------------------

EN

Automated checks SHOULD reject generated output containing architecture
regressions such as:

* per-source-Structure typedef struct definitions;
* descriptor fields in Lmx;
* generated runtime namespace push/pop calls;
* closure environment structs for source locals;
* nested-method stubs;
* source method signatures with more than one Lmx pointer parameter;
* compile-time-expanded merge members;
* direct C member access used as the only implementation of a dynamic source
  path.

Positive checks should verify symbol uniqueness, method-section membership,
root lookup, side-table population and runtime merge timing.

RU

Автоматические проверки должны отвергать generated output со следующими
архитектурными регрессиями:

* typedef struct на каждую Structure исходника;
* descriptor fields в Lmx;
* сгенерированные runtime-вызовы push/pop namespace;
* structs closure environment для locals исходника;
* заглушки вложенных методов;
* сигнатуры методов исходника более чем с одним Lmx pointer parameter;
* раскрытые во время трансляции members merge;
* прямой C member access как единственную реализацию динамического пути
  исходника.

Положительные проверки должны подтверждать уникальность символов,
принадлежность секции методов, lookup от root, заполнение side table и timing
runtime merge.


14. Explicitly unresolved items
Явно неразрешённые вопросы
=============================

EN

This section is exhaustive for known open architecture details at the time of
writing. These questions must be answered before their corresponding runtime
interfaces are frozen. They do not reopen the mandatory decisions in section
0.2.

14.1. Exact structural layout behind data

The Lmx header is fixed, but the exact memory layout addressed by data for a
non-leaf is not yet fixed. Candidates include a contiguous sequence of Lmx
nodes, a stable arena block, or another bounded representation compatible
with data plus len. The chosen layout must support stable node addresses,
ordered children, deep containment copying and range classification. This is
only a payload-layout choice: every mutable representation chosen here belongs
to the containing Message's one arena.

14.2. Unit and interpretation of len

The unit of len must be fixed for every physical range: child count, element
count, byte count or another explicit unit. One field may have
range-dependent meaning, but each range must have exactly one rule.

14.3. Empty representation

The exact distinction among null data, zero len, an explicitly present empty
Structure and an empty primitive/array buffer must be fixed. Unit and absence
must not become indistinguishable accidentally.

14.4. ShortNameId format

The bit width, deterministic generation, inter-module agreement, collision
handling, reserved IDs and conversion from an arbitrary runtime textual path
are open. The result must still require only the Lmx-pointer-to-ShortNameId
node table.

14.5. Positional and anonymous occurrence naming

Repeated named occurrence numbering is fixed: `[0]` is the first matching
child in result order and higher indexes proceed forward. What remains open is
whether positional/anonymous containment occurrences receive reserved
ShortNameId values and participate in the sole reverse table, or are excluded
from textual-name lookup and addressed only by structural position. The choice
must preserve copying, path diagnostics and the rule that no second per-node
metadata table is introduced.

14.6. Explicit graph references during merge

Containment descendants are copied and node is rebased. For a non-containment
reference stored in the copied tree, it remains to decide whether:

* every such reference preserves its original target; or
* a reference to a node inside the copied subtree is remapped to the
  corresponding copy while an external reference preserves its target.

If remapping is selected, merge needs a temporary old-address-to-new-address
work map. That temporary algorithmic map is not persistent node metadata and
must disappear after the copy.

14.7. Primitive copy and mutation policies

Interned immutable leaves naturally share their primitive address. Policies
for mutable cells, large numbers, byte buffers, opaque handles and foreign
resources remain to be specified by physical range. Every ordinary mutable
primitive cell created for a Message is nevertheless allocated in that
Message's arena; only its exact physical class/copy policy remains open.

14.8. Arrays

It remains to define which address range and data/len convention represents
ArrayReference, including rank, shape and element storage. This must not add
a per-Structure header or descriptor. The chosen ordinary Array header,
shape, elements and mutable backing belong to the containing Message arena.

14.9. Allocation, arenas and reclamation

Arena ownership is not open: every Message owns exactly one logical arena, and
all dynamic mutable ordinary Lmx storage of that Message is allocated there.
That arena remains with the Message across L3 turns and host-worker migration.
Open details are its block/slab/bump implementation, physical subdivision into
registered ranges, collector/tracer/compactor algorithm, bulk-destruction
mechanics, side-table cleanup, out-of-memory behavior and address reuse. Memory
pressure may request failure/termination or influence work at the next boundary,
but it does not add another graph-collection point. Local collection at the
common end-turn boundary,
after successful FIFO outbox publication or failed-turn rollback, is fixed.
Live address
identity must remain stable, either by not moving a live node or by atomically
rewriting every reference and re-keying its side-table entry as specified in
section 7.2.

14.10. Exact method return ABI

The one explicit Lmx pointer parameter is fixed. It remains to decide the C
return type and where success, failure and source return values live in the
runtime graph.

14.11. Call context subtree

The supplied pointer is fixed: it is the Structure containing the selected
callable occurrence (`callable->node`). What remains open is the exact
arrangement of source arguments, locals and result below or through that
containing Structure. All such values must be Structure nodes, and no
additional generated-method parameters or runtime namespace may be introduced.

14.12. Descriptor-only callable forms

The runtime representation and diagnostics for fn/sub declarations without a
body remain to be fixed. They must not be implemented as fake executable
zero-returning methods.

14.13. Method-section portability

The exact implementation for PE/COFF, ELF, Mach-O and other supported
profiles, including function-pointer versus void-pointer representation,
section bounds and dead-code elimination retention, remains open.

14.14. Path-mangling encoding

Path normalization, escaping, case rules, source-root identity, occurrence
encoding, linker length limits and optional collision-resistant hash fallback
remain open. Global uniqueness and reproducibility are fixed.

14.15. Top-level evaluation and reuse

Runtime merge timing is fixed: it occurs when control reaches it. It remains
to decide whether a particular top-level named value is evaluated once and
retained, evaluated per explicit consumption, or controlled by a separately
specified binding lifetime. Translation itself must not eagerly materialize
the merge.

14.16. Module linkage and loading

It remains to define how a module guarantees that referenced method entries
and Structure providers/references have been linked or loaded. This mechanism
must not be a hidden Name-to-value runtime namespace. Runtime merge does not
compile missing code.

14.17. Multiple roots and cross-root references

The lifetime and lookup behavior of multiple Messages, modules or execution
graphs, and the legality of explicit references between their roots, remain
to be defined within a fixed isolation boundary. Concurrently executing
Messages cannot share an ordinary mutable Lmx node by raw pointer. Delivery
must copy/serialize into the destination or new Message arena, adopt/transfer
storage only under an explicit rule that removes conflicting ownership, or
refer to explicitly immutable/global/foreign substrate. Arbitrary lookup
inside one graph still begins at that graph's root.

14.18. Concurrency

Common L3 concurrency is fixed: one Message owns one arena; one L3 Thread
executes no more than one turn at once; its admitted inbox/outbox order is FIFO;
different Message arenas may execute concurrently. Therefore allocation,
ShortNameId registration and merge within one Message have one semantic writer
and need no source-visible synchronization.

Open implementation details are atomic linearization of concurrent admissions,
worker scheduling/fairness between Messages, queue capacity/backpressure,
initialization of global immutable method/range registries and collector
coordination. L1 may synchronize those substrate mechanisms internally. An
explicit L2 shared-memory/thread profile may define its own atomics, locks and
memory order, but that custom contract is not common L3 or Mix semantics and
must not introduce a shared mutable runtime namespace.

14.19. Error handling and transactional merge

It remains to define whether a failed merge leaves no result, a partial
inaccessible allocation reclaimed with an arena, or an explicit failure
Structure. Published results must never expose half-rebased node links or
missing ShortNameId mappings.

14.20. Optimization policy

Caching constant path components, specializing range checks or sharing
immutable substrate may be considered after the generic implementation is
correct. Any optimization must remain observably equivalent after arbitrary
runtime merge and must not make static C layout part of language semantics.

RU

Этот раздел исчерпывающе перечисляет известные открытые архитектурные детали
на момент написания. На вопросы нужно ответить до фиксации соответствующих
runtime-интерфейсов. Они не открывают заново обязательные решения раздела
0.2.

14.1. Точный структурный layout за data

Заголовок Lmx закреплён, но точный layout памяти, адресуемой data нелистового
узла, ещё не закреплён. Варианты включают непрерывную последовательность
Lmx-узлов, стабильный arena block или другое ограниченное представление,
совместимое с data и len. Выбранный layout обязан поддерживать стабильные
адреса узлов, порядок детей, глубокое копирование вложенности и
классификацию диапазона. Это только выбор payload-layout: любое выбранное
здесь изменяемое представление принадлежит одной arena содержащего Message.

14.2. Единица и интерпретация len

Для каждого физического диапазона нужно закрепить единицу len: число детей,
число элементов, число байтов либо иную явную единицу. Одно поле может иметь
зависящий от диапазона смысл, но у каждого диапазона обязано быть ровно одно
правило.

14.3. Представление пустоты

Нужно закрепить точное различие между null data, нулевым len, явно
присутствующей пустой Structure и пустым буфером примитива/массива. Unit и
отсутствие не должны случайно стать неразличимыми.

14.4. Формат ShortNameId

Открыты разрядность, детерминированная генерация, межмодульное согласование,
обработка коллизий, зарезервированные ID и преобразование произвольного
runtime-текстового пути. Результат всё равно обязан требовать только таблицу
узлов Lmx-pointer-to-ShortNameId.

14.5. Именование позиционных и анонимных occurrences

Нумерация повторных именованных occurrences закреплена: `[0]` — первый
совпадающий ребёнок в порядке результата, более высокие индексы идут вперёд.
Открытым остаётся, получают ли позиционные/анонимные occurrences вложенности
зарезервированные ShortNameId и участвуют ли в единственной reverse table,
либо исключаются из текстового name lookup и адресуются только структурной
позицией. Выбор обязан сохранить копирование, диагностику путей и запрет на
вторую per-node metadata table.

14.6. Явные ссылки графа при merge

Потомки вложенности копируются, а node rebased. Для не-containment ссылки,
лежащей в копируемом дереве, нужно выбрать:

* каждая такая ссылка сохраняет исходную цель; либо
* ссылка на узел внутри копируемого поддерева перенаправляется на
  соответствующую копию, а внешняя ссылка сохраняет цель.

Если выбрано перенаправление, merge требуется временный work map
old-address-to-new-address. Эта временная алгоритмическая map не является
постоянными metadata узла и обязана исчезнуть после копирования.

14.7. Политики копирования и изменения примитивов

Interned immutable листья естественно совместно используют адрес примитива.
Для mutable cells, больших чисел, byte buffers, opaque handles и внешних
ресурсов политики ещё нужно определить по физическому диапазону. Однако любая
обычная mutable ячейка примитива, созданная для Message, выделяется в arena
этого Message; открыты только её точная физическая категория и copy policy.

14.8. Массивы

Нужно определить диапазон адресов и соглашение data/len для ArrayReference,
включая rank, shape и element storage. Это не должно добавлять
per-Structure header или descriptor. Выбранные обычные заголовок Array, shape,
элементы и mutable backing принадлежат arena содержащего Message.

14.9. Allocation, arenas и освобождение

Arena ownership не открыт: каждый Message владеет ровно одной логической
arena, и всё dynamic mutable обычное Lmx-хранилище этого Message выделяется в
ней. Эта arena остаётся с Message между L3 turns и при миграции между host
workers. Открыты block/slab/bump реализация arena, физическое разбиение на
зарегистрированные диапазоны, алгоритм collector/tracer/compactor, механика
bulk destruction, cleanup side table, out-of-memory и повторное использование
адресов. Memory pressure может запросить failure/termination либо повлиять на
работу на следующей границе, но не добавляет другой graph-collection point.
Локальная collection
на общей границе end-turn после успешной публикации FIFO outbox либо rollback
failed turn закреплена. Identity живого адреса обязана оставаться стабильной: узел либо не
перемещается, либо реализация атомарно переписывает все ссылки и re-key его
записи side table по разделу 7.2.

14.10. Точный ABI результата метода

Один явный параметр Lmx pointer закреплён. Нужно решить C return type и место
success, failure и source return values в runtime-графе.

14.11. Поддерево контекста вызова

Передаваемый указатель закреплён: это Structure, содержащая выбранный
callable-occurrence (`callable->node`). Открытым остаётся точное размещение
аргументов исходника, locals и результата под этой содержащей Structure либо
через её ссылки. Все эти значения обязаны быть узлами Structure; нельзя
добавлять параметры сгенерированного метода или runtime namespace.

14.12. Callable-формы без тела

Нужно закрепить runtime-представление и диагностику fn/sub declarations без
тела. Их нельзя реализовывать как фальшивые исполняемые методы, возвращающие
ноль.

14.13. Переносимость секции методов

Открыта точная реализация для PE/COFF, ELF, Mach-O и других поддерживаемых
профилей, включая представление function-pointer относительно void-pointer,
границы секций и удержание символов при dead-code elimination.

14.14. Кодирование path mangling

Открыты нормализация пути, escaping, правила регистра, identity source root,
кодирование occurrences, ограничения длины linker и необязательный
collision-resistant hash fallback. Глобальная уникальность и
воспроизводимость закреплены.

14.15. Top-level evaluation и повторное использование

Timing runtime merge закреплён: он происходит при достижении управлением.
Нужно решить, вычисляется ли конкретное top-level именованное значение один
раз и сохраняется, вычисляется при каждом явном consumption либо управляется
отдельно заданным lifetime binding. Сама трансляция не должна eager
материализовать merge.

14.16. Linkage и загрузка модулей

Нужно определить, как модуль гарантирует, что referenced method entries и
providers/ссылки Structure слинкованы или загружены. Этот механизм не должен
быть скрытым runtime namespace Name-to-value. Runtime merge не компилирует
отсутствующий код.

14.17. Несколько корней и cross-root ссылки

Нужно определить lifetime и lookup нескольких Messages, modules или execution
graphs, а также допустимость явных ссылок между их корнями внутри уже
закреплённой границы изоляции. Одновременно исполняемые Messages не могут
разделять обычный mutable Lmx-узел сырым указателем. Delivery обязана
копировать/сериализовать данные в arena назначения или нового Message,
adopt/transfer storage только по явному правилу, устраняющему конфликтующее
ownership, либо ссылаться на явно immutable/global/foreign субстрат.
Произвольный lookup внутри одного графа всё равно начинается от корня этого
графа.

14.18. Concurrency

Конкурентность общего L3 закреплена: один Message владеет одной arena; один L3
Thread исполняет не более одного turn одновременно; порядок принятого
inbox/outbox является FIFO; разные arena Messages могут исполняться
параллельно. Поэтому allocation, регистрация ShortNameId и merge внутри одного
Message имеют одного семантического писателя и не требуют видимой исходнику
синхронизации.

Открыты реализация атомарной линеаризации одновременных admissions,
scheduling/fairness между Messages, capacity/backpressure очереди,
инициализация глобальных immutable реестров методов/диапазонов и координация
collector. L1 может синхронизировать этот субстрат внутри реализации. Явный L2
shared-memory/thread профиль может определить собственные atomics, locks и
memory order, но такой custom contract не является семантикой общего L3 или
Mix и не должен вводить общий mutable runtime namespace.

14.19. Обработка ошибок и транзакционность merge

Нужно решить, оставляет ли неудачный merge отсутствие результата, частичный
недоступный allocation, освобождаемый arena, либо явную failure Structure.
Опубликованный результат никогда не должен показывать наполовину rebased
node или отсутствующие отображения ShortNameId.

14.20. Политика оптимизаций

Кэширование компонентов константного пути, специализация range checks или
совместное использование immutable substrate можно рассматривать после
корректной общей реализации. Любая оптимизация обязана оставаться наблюдаемо
эквивалентной после произвольного runtime merge и не должна делать
статический C layout частью семантики языка.


15. Initial rewrite sequence
Начальная последовательность переписывания
===============================================

EN

The following order is recommended because each step establishes an invariant
needed by the next:

1. Freeze parser regression tests and define the parser-tree adapter boundary.
2. Introduce the exact Lmx header without per-Structure extensions.
3. Preserve/implement exactly one logical arena per Message and derive that
   arena from a supplied Lmx node without a generated-method parameter.
4. Implement stable node allocation inside that arena and the sole ShortNameId
   side table.
5. Implement address-range classification for structural data, all_chars and
   the common callable physical class.
6. Implement direct/relative traversal and explicit-root absolute path lookup.
7. Implement deterministic collision-free method identities, preferably with
   full-source-path C mangling.
8. Recursively emit every method with the one-containing-Structure-pointer ABI
   and make it available through the common callable physical class.
9. Materialize source locals as Lmx nodes in the current Message arena.
10. Implement generic containment-tree copy with node rebasing and name-table
   registration.
11. Implement ordered runtime merge at execution sites, allocating the result
    in the current Message arena.
12. Preserve/implement the per-L3-Thread FIFO inbox/outbox and the invariant
    that turns of one L3 Thread never overlap while different Messages can run
    concurrently.
13. Preserve/implement publish-or-rollback followed by local Message-arena
    collection at every common end-turn boundary.
14. Add tests for runtime-produced merge inputs, nested methods, recursion and
    repeated names.
15. Add concurrency tests proving arena isolation, FIFO admission/publication,
    non-overlapping same-Message turns, end-turn collection ordering and
    parallel distinct Messages.
16. Rebuild the translator with the new core only after these runtime
    invariants pass independently.

This sequence is guidance, not permission to retain an incompatible old core
behind adapters.

RU

Рекомендуется следующий порядок, потому что каждый шаг устанавливает
инвариант для следующего:

1. Зафиксировать regression tests parser-а и границу adapter-а его дерева.
2. Ввести точный заголовок Lmx без расширений конкретной Structure.
3. Сохранить/реализовать ровно одну логическую arena каждого Message и
   определение этой arena по переданному Lmx-узлу без аргумента метода.
4. Реализовать stable allocation узлов внутри этой arena и единственную side
   table ShortNameId.
5. Реализовать классификацию диапазонов для структурных data, all_chars и
   общей физической категории callable.
6. Реализовать direct/relative traversal и lookup абсолютного пути от явно
   переданного root.
7. Реализовать детерминированные collision-free identity методов,
   предпочтительно с C-mangling полного пути исходника.
8. Рекурсивно эмитить каждый метод по ABI с одним указателем на содержащую
   Structure и делать его доступным через общую физическую категорию callable.
9. Материализовать locals исходника как Lmx-узлы в текущей arena Message.
10. Реализовать общее копирование дерева вложенности с rebasing node и
   регистрацией name table.
11. Реализовать упорядоченный runtime merge в местах исполнения с allocation
    результата в текущей arena Message.
12. Сохранить/реализовать FIFO inbox/outbox каждого L3 Thread и инвариант, по
    которому turns одного L3 Thread не пересекаются, а разные Messages могут
    исполняться параллельно.
13. Сохранить/реализовать publish-or-rollback с последующей локальной
    collection arena Message на каждой общей границе end-turn.
14. Добавить тесты результатов runtime merge как входов merge, вложенных
    методов, рекурсии и повторных имён.
15. Добавить concurrency tests, доказывающие isolation arena, FIFO
    admission/publication, отсутствие пересекающихся turns одного Message,
    порядок end-turn collection и параллельность разных Messages.
16. Самособирать транслятор новым ядром только после независимого прохождения
    этих runtime-инвариантов.

Эта последовательность является руководством, а не разрешением сохранить
несовместимое старое ядро за adapters.


16. Acceptance criteria
Критерии приёмки
====================

EN

The architecture rewrite is complete only when all of the following are true:

1. Existing parser behavior required by the language remains intact.
2. No generated named Structure requires a dedicated C struct or typedef.
3. The only common node header is node, len, data in that order.
4. A runtime node contains no name or descriptor.
5. The only auxiliary per-node mapping is Lmx pointer to ShortNameId.
6. Arbitrary textual absolute runtime paths resolve from an explicit root;
   direct pointers and relative paths retain their supplied start node; both
   remain correct after merge.
7. Runtime contains no namespace overlay machinery.
8. Every nested executable method has a real program-wide reachable
   implementation entry.
9. Every implementation identity is deterministic and program-wide unique;
   path-derived C names are preferred and collision-free.
10. Every source method accepts exactly one explicit Lmx pointer, and invocation
    passes exactly `callable->node`, the containing Structure.
11. Every callable payload is recognizable through the common callable
    physical class and resolves to the correctly typed entry.
12. Source locals have Lmx identity and correct node parents.
13. merge allocates a new containment tree only when execution reaches it.
14. merge copies nodes and rebases node rather than connecting containment by
    links.
15. merge accepts results that were themselves produced at runtime.
16. A copied method invokes its original C body with the copied callable's
    containing Structure, not the source owner or root.
17. HashArray translation does not require static analysis of Array's C
    layout or a whole-directory scan.
18. Self-hosting and regression tests validate semantic behavior rather than
    only the visual shape of generated C.
19. Mix is represented within the common Message/Lmx graph ontology; the
    current Java procedural/multithreaded implementation is not treated as the
    target architecture.
20. Every Message owns exactly one logical arena, and every dynamic mutable
    ordinary Lmx node/payload of that Message is allocated in it.
21. A generated source method derives its arena from its sole Lmx argument; it
    receives no hidden MessageThread, arena, allocator or ExecutionContext
    parameter.
22. One L3 Thread never executes two of its turns concurrently; admitted input
    and staged output preserve FIFO order, while distinct Messages can execute
    concurrently without sharing mutable arena storage.
23. Common Mix contains no transplanted Java/OS shared-memory synchronization
    algorithm; its concurrent behavior is expressed through Message ownership
    and Message delivery, independently of HTTP or any other transport.
24. Every turn publishes its successful FIFO outbox or rolls it back on failure
    before local collection of the Message arena; Message termination releases
    that arena only after required transfer and cleanup.

Failure of any item means that the version-2 core is not yet implemented,
even if individual examples compile.

RU

Архитектурное переписывание завершено только тогда, когда истинно всё
следующее:

1. Требуемое языком поведение существующего parser-а сохранено.
2. Ни одна generated именованная Structure не требует отдельного C struct
   или typedef.
3. Единственный общий заголовок узла содержит node, len, data именно в этом
   порядке.
4. Runtime-узел не содержит имени или descriptor.
5. Единственное вспомогательное per-node отображение — Lmx pointer в
   ShortNameId.
6. Произвольные текстовые абсолютные runtime-пути разрешаются от явно
   переданного root; direct pointers и относительные пути сохраняют переданный
   начальный узел; оба варианта остаются правильными после merge.
7. В runtime нет механизма overlay namespace.
8. Каждый вложенный исполняемый метод имеет настоящий достижимый во всей
   программе implementation entry.
9. Каждая implementation identity детерминирована и уникальна во всей
   программе; path-derived C-имена предпочтительны и не имеют коллизий.
10. Каждый метод исходника принимает ровно один явный Lmx pointer, и вызов
    передаёт ровно `callable->node`, содержащую Structure.
11. Каждый callable payload распознаётся через общую физическую категорию
    callable и разрешается в корректно типизированный entry.
12. Locals исходника имеют identity Lmx и правильных родителей node.
13. merge выделяет новое дерево вложенности только при достижении его
    исполнением.
14. merge копирует узлы и rebases node, а не соединяет вложенность ссылками.
15. merge принимает результаты, которые сами были произведены в runtime.
16. Скопированный метод вызывает своё исходное C-тело с содержащей Structure
    скопированного callable, а не с исходным owner или root.
17. Трансляция HashArray не требует статического анализа C-layout Array или
    сканирования всей директории.
18. Самосборка и regression tests проверяют семантическое поведение, а не
    только внешний вид сгенерированного C.
19. Mix представлен внутри общей Message/Lmx-онтологии графа; текущая
    процедурная многопоточная Java-реализация не считается целевой
    архитектурой.
20. Каждый Message владеет ровно одной логической arena, и каждый dynamic
    mutable обычный Lmx-узел/payload этого Message выделяется в ней.
21. Сгенерированный метод исходника определяет свою arena по единственному
    Lmx-аргументу; он не получает скрытый параметр MessageThread, arena,
    allocator или ExecutionContext.
22. Один L3 Thread никогда не исполняет два своих turn одновременно; принятый
    вход и подготовленный выход сохраняют FIFO-порядок, а разные Messages могут
    исполняться параллельно без общего mutable arena storage.
23. Общий Mix не содержит перенесённого Java/OS алгоритма shared-memory
    синхронизации; его конкурентность выражается через ownership Messages и
    доставку Messages независимо от HTTP или любого другого транспорта.
24. Каждый turn публикует успешный FIFO outbox либо откатывает его при failure
    до локальной collection arena Message; termination освобождает arena только
    после обязательного transfer и cleanup.

Невыполнение любого пункта означает, что ядро версии 2 ещё не реализовано,
даже если отдельные примеры компилируются.


17. Compact invariant checklist
Краткий список инвариантов
==============================

    Parser stays.                           / Parser сохраняется.
    Translator core is replaced.            / Ядро транслятора заменяется.
    One node shape: node, len, data.         / Одна форма узла.
    node is the source-tree parent.          / node — родитель дерева исходника.
    data is always a pointer.                / data всегда указатель.
    Payload class comes from address range.  / Класс payload задаёт диапазон.
    No node name or descriptor.              / В узле нет имени/desсriptor.
    One Lmx* -> ShortNameId side table.       / Одна side table имён.
    Arbitrary textual absolute paths start   / Произвольный текстовый абсолютный
    at an explicit root.                     / путь идёт от явно переданного root.
    No runtime namespace.                    / Runtime namespace отсутствует.
    No per-Structure C typedef.               / Нет C typedef на Structure.
    Source locals are Lmx nodes.              / Locals исходника — Lmx-узлы.
    One Lmx* argument per C method.           / Один Lmx* аргумент метода.
    Program-wide reachable unique methods.   / Методы достижимы во всей программе.
    Path-mangled names are preferred.         / Path-mangled имена предпочтительны.
    One callable physical class.              / Одна физическая категория callable.
    Nested bodies are emitted and live.       / Вложенные тела эмитятся.
    Mix is a Message/Lmx graph.                / Mix — Message/Lmx-граф.
    One arena belongs to each Message.         / У каждого Message одна arena.
    Dynamic mutable values use that arena.     / Mutable значения лежат в ней.
    One L3 Thread turn runs at a time.          / Один turn L3 Thread за раз.
    Inbox/outbox ordering is FIFO.              / Порядок inbox/outbox — FIFO.
    Distinct Messages may run in parallel.      / Разные Messages параллельны.
    Outbox precedes end-turn collection.        / Outbox раньше collection.
    Termination releases the Message arena.     / Termination освобождает arena.
    Common Mix uses Message coordination.       / Mix координируется Messages.
    Raw synchronization is explicit L2 only.   / Raw-синхронизация только в L2.
    merge runs at execution time.             / merge работает в runtime.
    merge creates a copied tree.              / merge создаёт копию дерева.
    Copied node links point into the copy.     / node копии указывает в копию.
    Runtime merge results are mergeable.      / Результаты merge снова mergeable.
    C is a secondary projection.              / C — вторичная проекция.


End of normative architecture agreement.
Конец нормативного архитектурного соглашения.
